There's no way this guy is *really* Korean.  He hasn't got the pathological self-deprecation right.
Lord of the Rings Online: has an absolutely awesome Sountrack.
The fuck it song in Spanish: http://www.imeem.com/people/4fSiML/music/QhKQd-up/la-banda-algarete-que-se-joda/
Ha! Same as hockey players. They must enjoy bloody knuckles.
*You* are clever my friend.
Does it *have* to be human?
I've been lurking reddit for 3 years. Didn't register because I figured an e-mail address was required. I didn't even bother to check.   After seeing this, I have an account! Woo hoo!
This one time, my friends and I got some m80's and lit them off. My step-mom's lap dog thought the sparkling end of the fuse to one of them was really interesting, and picked up the m80 like it was a stick. The m80 blew it's lower jaw off.  I hated that dog. lol.
The Chrono Cross soundtrack is my all time favorite.
Well, it's pretty good, but the famous [Epic Thread](http://www.reddit.com/comments/6nz1k/got_six_weeks_try_the_hundred_push_ups_training/c04ehte), is way smarter and funnier, in my opinion.
Keep going strong?
to me there are 2 interesting things here: insight in to how the people of shanghai view the city, and Jinn Chee turning the pages of his book as quietly as possible. why? just because he is quite, or is he quiet for good reason? i get the feeling that some of these details aren't important. and i also agree self referential art (films about filmmakers, comedians talking about standup, etc.) almost always puts me off immediately, so you'd have to work to get me back into the story. 
what... the fuck?
And then let them go once they discovered they were journalists. Most of the article is sourced by journalists from a news organization funded by Chavez. No propaganda here, eat it all up kids!
Why does it have six nostrils?
The floating ads are fucking annoying. When I'm on autopilot, I usually avoid or close those sites almost immediately.  That being said, I don't use adblock for all the reasons people don't, but every now and then when I'm showing someone or my nephew a website and HOT LOCAL SINGLES or some shit banner ad pops up, I get annoyed.
But BIG PHARMA ZOMG!!!!
Is it something 6.02214179×10^23 ?
Ah... you're right. On second look, it's not in by default, though it is in the distribution (and gNewSense are pretty strict about what's allowed). It is installed by default in Gobunto.
But she couldn't find her son's house. 
Yeah but this one is an easy fish to fry.
41% of people who voted.
She could sell T-Shirts.
[I refuted Raldi](http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/8wi83/weve_got_mail_orangered_mail/c0apkm8)
&lt;3
flaming homers? maybe even a flaming moe?
that is the fucking awesomest thing evar!!
No, that's an Na
&gt;And yes, it's just an opinion, far from a fact, and it is as likely to be false as it is to be true.  We know what an unverifiable claim is, you know.
Is there an Irish dish that *isn't* made with whiskey?
Thanks. Since I usually use Firebug, it's no big deal anyway.
So they don't count if they are only on the books for five or so years?   I'm not saying your system is flawed, no system is immune from this sort of thing, particularly when extreme events lead to public opinion that practically demanded the new laws. But if you let yourself live under the belief that "our system is perfect" then it's imperfections will shine through. 
Down.
Del Amitri - lots of their stuff can be depressing, but try "Driving With the Brakes On"
Those were the reasons: - Both are in their mid 20's living at home   - Both feel the need to hide the relationship from family/friends   - Male has never tried another romantic relationship  - Male and female are full siblings The first three are bad for any relationship, the fourth just makes it creepy *and* unhealthy.   
**HEY GUYS.  Remember about a month ago when there was a lot of "oh look, cool html canvas app" spam on the front page ?  Can you re post that now that we all have a browser that can use it?**
I realise this, but I still think it's too spread out. I don't care what the vote amount is, it doesn't have to be that big (and between 2 arrows). I like it how it was a year ago when compressed view wasn't an option, it was the default.
I thought "no that's silly, I'm an atheist and I have views on those things."  Then I realised. Thanks, xhandler.  Actually now I think about it, it's somewhat saddening. I probably have much less in common with the other atheists than I had thought. What a lonely, godless world we live in. Perhaps religion can help. On the basis of the information in front of me, I choose... Buddhism (being in a long term committed unmarried relationship, I'm okay with those two brown squares).
Hey guys,  Heres a guide that I wrote for my dealer since I was slightly concerned about his health. The actual pharmacological info isn't perfectly accurate but it's accurate to the point of being useful and I honestly think it's a worthwhile read regardless.   This is the guide that I and my friends use for our rolls and we all end up feeling happy and content the following day so take it as you will.  Oh ya raver names Jesus and in case there are any SoCal redditors who my have seen me at a rave, sup =-)  Jesus' Guide to Etardation Prevention  By: Jesus Fucking Christ  Summary: We've all seen them. Wandering through raves with that strange happy, yet blank look on their faces. Yes I'm talking about Etards. Luckily, there are ways to keep yourself from ending up just like them; even better, it's not all that hard.  What causes Etardation: Etardation is caused when a person takes MDMA too often without taking the proper precautions. Now what is too much really does depend on the person. Some people can roll every day without damage; others will get a little bit of brain damage every time they roll; some will even die on their first roll (the numbers are something like 1 in every 30million people and if you're able to roll once you're probably relatively safe so I wouldn't worry about it).  Actual Etardation is caused by oxidized dopamine. I'm no doctor so I'm just going to give you what is essentially accurate, at least as far as it matters for the purposes of this guide. When MDMA floods your brain with serotonin it creates a lot of free radicals. These free radicals are chemicals that generally make a mess of things in your head. They go bouncing around between your neuron receptors causing damage. The most prevalent of these is oxidized dopamine and that is what tends to cause you damage. Another issue that occurs due to MDMA use is serotonin depletion. This can cause mood swings as well as a few other nasty issues that you don't want to deal with.  There are other issues that come about from MDMA use which shouldn't be too much of a problem for healthy individuals but should always be taken into account. Ecstasy is almost always cut with other drugs such as Heroin, Meth, 2c-i, coke, caffeine, piperazine, and many many others. All of these drugs have different issues that should be taken into account so it is wise to do your research before taking any pill.   When you take Ecstasy, chances are you will experience elevated heart rate, increased body temperature, jaw clenching, and a few other conditions. These are normal and luckily a few of them are even preventable.  So I'm planning on rolling next Saturday, what should I do? There are quite a few things that I would recommend you do before a roll. All of these suggestions will help with your recovery; some will even make your roll stronger = ).  I personally recommend taking 2000mg of Vitamin C every day however when I know that I'm going to be rolling I like to up my dosage to 4000mg a day. It is water soluble and honestly it would be very hard to take too much of it so the more the merrier. Vitamin C will also give you a slightly better roll.  Take Piracetam. For emphasis let me say this again, take Piracetam. In my experience it is one of the most valuable substances in a roller's kit. Piracetam increases blood circulation throughout your brain allowing easier uptake of substances (meaning you roll harder) as well as a smoother comedown. It also comes with the additional perks of making you need less sleep, have awesome lucid dreams, you develop a better memory, and you become slightly faster in your daily mental duties. I say this from experience, I take Piracetam every day and it has done all of those things for me. If you see me at a rave you may notice that I'm having a really, really good time. I thank the Piracetam for that.  The best part about it? One study done on the subject found that taking Piracetam daily prevented ALL neurotoxicity after a rave. That is why I believe everyone who rolls should use it. My other suggestions are pretty much common sense. Get exercise. Eat lots of fruits and veggies. The more the better. If you don't eat fruits and veggies then take supplements to cover all of the nutrition that you're missing out on.  The day of your roll I'd also recommend taking something with magnesium in it. This will help you with jaw clenching.  So I rolled ballz last night, what now? Take 5-htp. This one is right up there with Piracetam for me. 5-htp is what your brain uses to make serotonin. If you take 5-htp after your roll it gives your brain a jump start on replenishing your serotonin levels which will not only help mitigate post roll depression, but will also go a long ways in preventing Serotonin Syndrome.   After I roll I like to take 200mg of 5-htp when I have finished and then 100mg a day for 3 days. Taking it before you have finished rolling has the possibility of killing your roll.  Try to take at least 4000mg of Vitamin C as well as some Vitamin K and B. These Vitamins will help your body recover from the ordeal that is dancing for hours on end while on a drug that makes your heat beat faster and your body get hotter. Take Magnesium. This will help you to not chew up your lips as badly as you probably do.   Piracetam is just as important now as it was before you rolled. I personally take it daily and would just recommend that everyone do that as well.  Get some sleep and try to eat some fruits and veggies. I sometimes like to go to Jamba Juice and have a Pomegranate Heart Happy with an antioxidant and immunity boost. Pomegranate Heart Happy has a ton of antioxidants in it with its combination of blueberry and Pomegranate and it tastes fucking amazing.  If you are unable to sleep that is usually do to whatever variety of speed was in your pill; usually Meth. The only way that I am away of to get some sleep is to take a Benzo such as Xanax. Personally I would recommend it but do whatever you feel comfortable with on this one. Just keep in mind that sleep is EXTREMELY important after you roll and you should probably find a way to do it to prevent any sort of brain damage.  Weed also helps a ton so blaze it up my friend! Summary  Before you roll Take 4000mg Vitamin C  Take Piracetam Sleep well and exercise Eat fruits and veggies Take Magnesium  After you roll: Take 4000mg of Vitamin C Take Piracetam Get some sleep Eat Fruits and Veggies Take 200mg of 5-HTP Take Magnesium Go to Jamba Juice Weed
Aye, Grooveshark is a fucking godsend. 
"emitted a little cloud of shit-dust when it was pulled apart."
I think it's more like, "No, I am **not** sharing this tasty flying mammal with you, now go away."
After Susan Boyle and some other Reality TV contestants that had break downs and tantrums it's time for the Producers to start screening the contestants better. Auditions will in the future include screenings for prior history of Depression and other Psychiatric disorders. Big Brother Producers are you listening. 
Damn I thought that was Fiona Apple.
[sockdreams.com](http://www.sockdreams.com) ;)
Jesus was often described as a shepherd guiding sheep. We all know that some shepherds love their sheep just a little too much.... if you know what I mean. Therefore according to the bible, since Jesus fucked sheep, priests are allowed to fuck little boys. This is common sense people. 
Read the Honduran Constitution, stop being a brainwashed Chavez fan.
Sounds a lot like my cousin...
Monkeys don't go to work, silly.
I wonder if the hypnosis helped more with reducing your perceived stress level, which just made it easier to pass the test time, as it reduced your test anxiety enough to allow you to benefit from taking the test and the extra time to study?  I wouldn't think the sleep/subconscious thing would help much. My experience of listening to things at night is that they cause me to wake up or else intrude into my dreams. Either way I end up not getting a proper nights sleep, which is just counterproductive when you want to be learning new things.
To friends! *clink*
Yeah, I'm not sure what that's about.  If you drill down into the [actual bill for 2700 N Ocean Dr, Unit 1001B](http://www.co.palm-beach.fl.us/papa/aspx/web/RenderDocImage.aspx?pcn=56434226140021001&amp;ftype=PDF) (PDF) it doesn't look like a typical property tax bill since it's broken out into city services.  It looks like the condos at [2700 N. Ocean Dr range from $1.3M - $7M](http://www.interinvestments.com/english/2700_north_ocean.htm), so obviously the assessed value won't be anywhere close to the $76k that shows on the bill - maybe it's for their parking spot, who knows. I know some cities asses taxes on property (the building) and then separately on the real estate (the land), so perhaps this is something along those lines - that may be the tenants portion of the actual acreage of land the building occupies.  This is just a guess, I'd be interested if anyone has any more detail.
I live being an American! I mean, we got mad oil now, thats sick!
Sitio para el shopping y la moda, para zapatos, bolsos, complementos, cremas, perfumes. Articulos con gran descuento de HErmes, Armani, Prada, Gucci, LV, MArc JAcobs, Kiehls, La Prairie, Burberrys, Ralph Lauren, Cavalli y mucho mas.... Merece la pena Chicas!!! :)
Females are told that blue balls are a myth by persons in authority because men use it as an excuse to guilt women into bed. Girls don't want to put the boy into physical pain after messing around, so they feel like they can't say no when the boy plays the blue balls card.  I was told by my sex ed teacher in junior high and my mother that it was a myth. Obviously I've learned since then that it isn't. But I've also learned that it isn't a good enough reason to consent to sex if you're not ready.
follow the instructions to know this is the pics section you worthless spammer
The game soundtracks I listen to come from the days when game soundtracks were shipped as audio tracks 2-X on the CD. Put the original CD in the player, and skip to track 2.  * Command &amp; Conquer - Covert Ops * Mechwarrior 2 - Ghost Bear's Legacy
Fuck yeah!
It's also got McAfee installed.
I'm not as afraid of needles as some people are; it's more *thinking* about needles. If you give me a needle and I'm on my way, I'll be fine. But if I need to sit around in a medical environment and wait before/after, I will probably end up passed out.  Liquid medicine, crushed up pills, chewable tablets are all fine, but I have never been able to swallow a pill -- which is unfortunate, because I currently have a stack of them I really need to take. :/
&gt;Government controls our law enforcement, road construction, national guard and fire protection...  Those are legitimate functions of a federal government. 
When people produce the most obvious hoaxes as evidence for scientific doubt about global warming, I feel no doubt they should be exposed. I believe people are more interested in the *truth* than how much *you* are offended by being exposed.  Your entire argument is built on "I don't understand these things, therefore no one else can". The planet's climate scientists are in no doubt - and that IPCC probability is built on science that is at *least* five years old. That's out of date. Things are worse now.  Your explanation of science is lovely until you hit '4'. We don't have spare planets to perform the experiments on. We only have the one we live on. The science is certain - we are dangerously warming the planet by pumping *billions* of tons of carbon pollution in to the atmosphere every year. That has to stop.
Yes, that answer was much easier than actually addressing [our real argument](http://www.reddit.com/r/environment/comments/8wjh6/krugman_global_warming_deniers_committing_treason/c0ap97g).
That's a good question; However, in the context of an internet item in an internet game, such a trade would not be taxable.  Internet bartering is new territory for tax law. I actually haven't read up about it much, if there even is material to really read. However, I do know that internet transactions are treated differently from physical transactions, so it's impossible to make an analogy between the two.  But the main reason why I know that such an exchange wouldn't be taxable is because bartering does not include trades made on an informal and noncommercial basis. Now, if you had two *companies* trading a bunch of Diablo II items for some WoW accounts for the purpose of eventual resale, I'm not quite sure.
http://opensword.org/Pixen/
dont expecty an ounce of truth coming from a leftist
Even if it has a lot of shared RAM....the footprint of each of the individual processes is way too much.
Yes... but [which one has blue eyes](http://terrytao.wordpress.com/2008/02/05/the-blue-eyed-islanders-puzzle/)?
Anyone know if PlugY ever got updated to 1.12?  I avoided that patch for that alone.
...and the urge to remove your kid's eyes and cut your own legs/face off...
4chan may be seedy... but I don't think you should be cheering for the Chinese on this one.
Allah day.
Wow, that was surprisingly powerful.  I had to watch it a few times too.  Made me pause and think about where my life is along that 42 seconds.  Someone post something funny damn it!  ***fades off into introspective thought...
nice metaphore
Dude, we're talking a million dollars. This is a few hours of inconvenience at most.
Didn't the toilet snake incident happen in Porky's? I've always had this fear after seeing it on tv when I was young. Didn't know where it came from until someone recently mentioned that part from the movie. 
I think Carmack is really more concerned with perfecting game engines than the games that are actually played on those engines.
Great scott!
Well, the private banking industry was doing exceedingly well, thats why the government had to step in. So something does not compute.
No, I don't think lucid dreaming would help with audio sleep learning. I know plenty about [lucid dreaming](http://www.jrmooneyham.com/playg.html) AND audio sleep learning (see my other comments on this page), and don't believe combining them would help.
Honestly, yes.
yeah the movie was the best part.
Re-submitted [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/8x4sa/i_am_a_wow_addict_ask_me_anything_resubmitted/)
I've tried to explain this very point before to people with strong liberal/socialist tendencies, and they just don't get it - or don't want to get it.  I'm not certain there is any way to get through to them, either.
Re-submitted [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/8x4sa/i_am_a_wow_addict_ask_me_anything_resubmitted/)
Persona 4, Metal Gear Solid 4, and FFVI are some of my favorites. Also Lost Odyssey
It's something in their kimchi recipe.
The impression that I get of Erik Naggum (I went through all his cll postings on an idle day a few years ago) is that he was at a minimum over-excitable. When he flew off the handle, he usually had a good reason for doing so, though often out of proportion with with the offense.  With that sort of behavior, the best policy is just not to feed the troll. His greatest flaw was pointed out by someone on cll (Tilton?) that he cared a bit too much about what other people thought, a trait that seems to be shared by eg/rg.  Naggum vs cll has the character of a soap opera at times, but to the detached observer, it becomes a little theatre of human relationships and flaws that observes itself and comments upon itself as it unfolds. In the years since it ended, and especially upon Erik's death, I've quite appreciated much of the commentary on it, since there has been a good deal of wisdom about human things in the comments that many have made about it which give the tragic scene (and it is pretty close to being a tragedy in the technical sense of the word, rather than the popular sense) a value that rises a little bit above members of an online community taking potshots at each other over a period of a few years.
ExtraPrivateAccount's got it all, yes he does, he knows how to please in every detaaail... he can do more, than you'd ever imagine, and do it with *style*, he does it with me, oh yes he does...
Halo has an amazing soundtrack.
really? I know of 2. Jim Jeffords and Dick Durbin.
Well let me explain it because you are apparently a fucking dumb shit.  When first looking at my rights and what institutions exists to support them, I find that practically, all 10 of them are covered. 1, 3-10 by the ACLU and 2 by the NRA. This neither discards the ACLU's position on the 2nd, nor lets them off the hook, it merely notes that there isn't a huge gaping hole.  Now you, the master of dumbshittery, think that even though I twice make note (the first in saying I disagree with their policy, and again later when agreeing that there is a problem with their interpretation) think that my making that statement means I am giving the ACLU a pass. Good for you, you're an idiot.  Now, as for my comment &gt;Well, aside from the official position, there is the understanding that there IS an organization in the NRA that handles 2nd amendment issues.  This is from actually talking to the ACLU well before your little call to action. Oh noes, I passed along actual information.  What exactly was the response you got when you spoke with the ACLU? Have you actually had a conversation with them regarding the second amendment or are you just jerking off here on reddit?
haha, i totally do have that stoner-eyes satisfied orgasm face, don't i. haahahha :)
I had one roommate who was an alcoholic, mentally unstable (believed his ex-gf was monitoring his phone calls) and refused go to job interviews, so he never got a job.  He would then call and scream at the prospective employer for not offering him the job just because he didn't show up to the interview.  I was frequently forced to pay more than my share of the bills to avoid disconnection.  After we all moved out he called repeatedly and threatened me.  It's tough to put into words but he was by far the worst  roommate ever; the only roommate I was ever actually afraid of.  On a lighter note, another time with other folks, I came home to find the bathtub full of brown chunks, and a plunger laying there in the bathtub.  A few minutes later another of the roommates, a super neat freak gay guy, got home.  I just said, "Go look in the bathtub."  So he did.  He was pretty upset.  Fortunately, he's also a master diplomat so when the offender got home the situation was corrected.  The particular "offender" here was actually one of my better roommates and we are still friends; he was just never much into being clean and this particular incident was just a little much.
Well... Damn, didn't catch that one.
Yes, I muddied my language a bit, what I meant is that yes while it's possible to see a speed boost from threading USER CODE (I'm assuming platform code like sound, I/O are already on their own thread), this hasn't been the major limiter for flash games, it's the renderer that slows down flash games still.
No, they most likely polled a smaller group.  See how they have personal information like 17% of men used a vibrator by themselves?
What we've got here is a failure to communicate. I assumed you hadn't seen it. 
Is there a way to get it to indent first lines of a &lt;p&gt;  ?
It's not "Nevada coercing Washington to lower its taxes" - it's just a reality of interstate commerce. Accept the reality and move on.  Regarding the music shop that lost business over the 9% sales tax - first of all, a lot of online stores actually charge sales tax (generally because they have B&amp;M locations in the state). Yet they keep doing business.  Are there businesses along the state lines, even though there are lower taxes a few miles away?  This is a problem, but it's a solvable problem. Add value. Find out which online stores charge sales tax and make sure your customers know. Encourage them to shop in your store. Etc. It's a sales problem, not a "get DC to solve it for me" problem. Another thought (just stream of consciousning here) - *if* Amazon starts collecting the 9% sales tax, do we expect people to stop buying from Amazon.com? (No tax advantage, shipping costs, no instant gratification). That seems like a pretty ridiculous suggestion. So there must be a reason people go to Amazon *besides* the tax advantage.  And let's say people *did* stop buying from Amazon.com in big numbers. Maybe Amazon would just stop selling in RI completely. Now there's no online competition at all.  If the services provided really are something that people want, then make up the revenue in other ways. If folks aren't buying locally but buying online, then they have more money that can be taxed through state income taxes or property taxes. 
I closed 124 tabs in 3.5b3 a few weeks ago on 4G of ram. 
If the world's biggest pop star only made $12 million a year from his recordings, why would anyone make serious music?  1. Love for music? 2. Since when was a $12 million chump change?  The mentality behind this article is exactly what is wrong with our country.
Stephen King, get out! You should be writing a *good* novel! 
What the hell are you talking about? Tekken, Street Fighter, SNK vs. Capcom, Marvel vs. Capcom, Smash Bros. Collectively known as "fighting games" are played with conventional controllers or arcade sticks. 
I had a fear of evil spirits and ghosts until I realized it was all a mind trick from my religious upbringing.
Medicine is a tool of satan
Yes...but it's usally just minor factual/grammatical edits, or adding citations.
If you have access to Cincinnati-style chili, you can cover them with the chili, onions, and shredded cheese.  Serve on a piece of garlic toast.  It's pretty tasty.
I kept waiting to get Bel-Aired.  Good god. 
About Objects today announced a new public schedule for iPhone Programming Workshop, a hands-on developer training course on the iPhone SDK. The course has been updated to reflect Apples recent release of the latest 3.0 version of the SDK. Classes will be conducted July 27 - July 31, and August 10 - August 14, at the About Objects headquarters in Reston, VA, and August 24 - August 28 near the Apple campus in Cupertino, CA.
I'm only happy when it rains!
There's a similiar one in Seattle in Beltown advertising a Hip Hop act.
[facepalm.jpg](http://scienceblogs.com/insolence/facepalm.jpg)
Jesse Ventura, one of the most honest people in government, has a very poor opinion of Norm Coleman, as a person and a politician.   &gt; ...Coleman's always been a hypocrite. He never does what he says. He said election night, when he won, that [Al] Franken should drop out, and he should be the senator. Well, then the same should hold true after the recount.  http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2009/05/12/jesse-ventura-coleman-a-h_n_202629.html
&gt; Both are in their mid 20's living at home  Totally common over here.  &gt; Both feel the need to hide the relationship from family/friends  Not from each of us' closest friends. Hidden from others because of social prejudice, not because we'd hide it otherwise. If there's anything sickly here, it's our society.  &gt; Male has never tried another romantic relationship  So? My father was my mother's first boyfriend.  &gt; Male and female are full siblings  Bingo. Social prejudice. If you can explain how this will hurt anyone and why is it unhealthy, please go on, otherwise thanks for playing.
Video link is dead.  Aww, I was looking forward to some lulz! :)
Wait, what? He _jumped out of a bush_. Doesn't matter what color you are, I'm going to be a little scared/confused about that. Tell him to try it by just strolling up to someone on the street and see if it still works.
Thats a manatee.
I'm disappointed it had no MC Hammer interjected into the middle there...  yesh, even in a puff piece like this, Bill-O still sounds like a total Douche-O  My almost 4 year old son saw this, and now wants to play Mario.  I guess my fears that my son would have no interest in the games of my youth are unfounded.
Masturbation is a form of sex. Porn is only there for wanking.
Fuld wouldn't agree, he did get a very nice one and now he is resting.
The 11th Appellate Dist court of Ohio has found the changes made by Senate bill 10 (made according to the Adam Walsh Act) unconstitutional in the case of Spangler v. State, 2009-Ohio-3178. Opinion issued 6-30-2009 which goes as follows:
&gt;I'm kind of torn. I think nuclear would be better than blowing the tops off of mountains,  Not that I like coal, but I don't see what the big deal is with mountaintop removal. It's just a topographic change, and the vegetation comes back after a few years (and forests, a few more decades), so the "barren landscape" scare pictures don't seem particularly honest.  There were photos of reclaimed mines on here a while back:  http://www.mywvhome.com/mountaintop.htm  I would think underground mining is worse. It kills thousands of miners, through dust inhalation and mine collapse.
Bootcamp + VMWare  You can use the same partition in VMware. Parallels feels too unstable. I suggest upgrading to 4gb of ram for virtualization. Also make sure you partition enough space, you won't be able to repartition.
Life is a fucking pyramid scheme.
Not to mention half the crew was Maquis, not starfleetGODWHYDOIKNOWTHIS????
I feel it's a little strange to imagine that someone's development as a human being has such a correlation to the amount of red they've seen on a screen during the past few years. 
I agree completely. The old testament  goes on to say that after that they realized their nakedness.
stfu u socialist u use force to steal from people so take ur envious evil ways out of here ans go back to india
Better than putting it behind a paywall.
^ That.
WTH is Microsoft 7?  I already have Microsoft 2008.
Just a waffle iron on a stick, you can tell by the pixels.
But you can't lan it anyway, that's the point! Pirating it will be pointless.
Unless you bring unicode into it, hyphens (hyphen-minus) and dashes are the same ASCII character. This character is valid is domain registrations.  This character is present on a all US keyboards I've seen, usually next to the zero on the top row of numbers.
I always like to tell about a quaint and rather racist custom that we have in Holland. We celebrate Saint Nicholas in the beginning of december in a manner that would shock Americans: The white saint enters a city on a steam boat from Spain (supposedly) with a large group of black 'servants', white people in blackface donning afro wigs and wearing red lipstick called ['black petes'](http://bit.ly/r0ESe)(img). They also wear 'exotic' clothing to drive the point home that they're not from here and speak in broken Dutch.  Now to be fair, they've made the thing a little more politically correct by saying that the black faces are because of soot, and they're speaking properly now. There are also small protests groups on this day that walk around in 'greenface' to change the custom.  But by and large, nobody cares, and nobody minds. Not white people, not black people. And I think that this, in an odd way, is a great example of moving past racism, anti-racism or whatever you might call it, and generally irritating sensitivity that doesn't really help actually bringing people together.  (and let me add that Dutch people really are not known for being racist, as far as I know...)
Can we make an artificial neuron?  If we do and slowly replace a brain's real neurons with artificial ones, what philosophical implications does that have about our notion of identity?
Where do you two work? The Vatican?
But it matters.  On the mothership, you see, they use telepathy, so they want to put us at a disadvantage in preparation for the takeover.
*ACTING!* 
It started as just Canada.  I was helping someone learn how to post crisper photos for their Canada Day blog and then I started looking for USA Flag bikinis.  Next thing I knew there was the EU, the French, Australia...  It's like potato chips.  I couldn't stop myself.
Next stop: The White House.
Ladies and gentlemen, may I introduce [Dr. Horatio Nelson Jackson](http://www.sfgate.com/cgi-bin/article.cgi?f=/c/a/2003/06/16/MN281103.DTL), otherwise known as "The Mad Doctor". Considered the first to cross the United States in two months and 800 gallons of gasoline.  &gt;In the spring of 1903, on a whim and a fifty-dollar bet, Dr. Horatio Nelson Jackson set off from San Francisco in a 20-horsepower Winton touring car hoping to become the first person to cross the United States in the new-fangled "horseless carriage." At the time there were only 150 miles of paved roads in the entire country, all of them within city limits. There were no gas stations and virtually no road maps as we know them today. Most people doubted that the automobile had much of a future. Jackson's trip would prove them wrong.   [Wikipedia Link](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Horatio_Nelson_Jackson).  And the highly recommended PBS Ken Burns documentary [Horatio's Drive](http://www.pbs.org/horatio/index.html).  Oh, and his dog [Bud](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/File:Photo_bud_portrait.jpg).  When he pulled into small, rural towns the people were stunned and even frightened, they had never seen or heard of a "horseless carriage". To them to it would be our reaction if a UFO landed in our backyard. 
I was kidding. Bernie destroyed the lives of people in some ways worse than physical harm. He should be locked up, in solitude, for life.
I still miss oink....:*(
Best part:   &gt;She bemoaned her changing fortunes in Alaska. “I think things here that have so drastically changed these past months … Some want to forbid others from speaking up, and it’s been through lawsuits, been ethics-violation charges, media distortions And those are the folks who want to tell me, they want to tell you to sit down and shut up. We will not do so. I just can’t because I love my state, I love my country, and I need you, we need Michael Reagan to keep on fighting for our freedoms, for our country, and what we’re being fed today, it seems, is a steady diet of selected misrepresented news So I join you in speaking up and asking the questions and taking action, and here at home in my beloved Alaska, I just say, politically speaking, if I die, I die.”
Especially after she denied it later.
The 11th Appellate Dist court of Ohio has found the changes made by Senate bill 10 (made according to the Adam Walsh Act) unconstitutional in the case of Spangler v. State, 2009-Ohio-3178. Opinion issued 6-30-2009 which goes as follows:
I'm still waiting for that Unocal pipeline to be built through Afganistan too...
Especially orchestral versions thereof, e.g. Hyrule Symphony or some of the stuff at [ZREO](http://www.zreomusic.com/).
I feel bad for her, and these events are unfortunate.  But I feel the need to address that article. Through the snerky commentary I was able to 'guess' that a woman wrote that article. Furthermore, I'd wager money that the writer of that article has been jilted herself.  I don't appreciate that type of writing and I find it unprofessional. It undermines everything that Jenny Sanford stands up for.
If you worry about acetaminophen, just simply don;t swallow it.  if you have codeine tablets for headache, just drop em into a bit of water, filter out the binder, and put it in freezer for 15 minutes. acetam is not soluble in cold water and it will precipitate on top of liquid, while codein will stay diluted in water.   simply filter or pour remaining liquid into another glass and drink. no more acetaminophen entering your system.  it's called cold water extraction
Come on man!
If your friend is a bad person then ya narc on the dealer.   If he is a good person and doesn't believe in completely ruining someone elses life for little gain then he probably should not narc on his dealer.
Good thing it didn't pull shit from my machine that I already knew it could pull. Actually, it couldn't even pull my machine type correctly. It shows it as Win32 when it is actually x64.  Now I'll be impressed when it can do a portscan from the inside using javascript like the author says he will eventually implement.
Ugh.
&gt;wanna disable downvotting of articles and see how it plays out?  How?
Males never deny things that are true, I think you are wrong.
This brings me to a point that I came to yesterday.  Permadeath.  Make the game, in some ways, roguelike. 
?
SUBMIT AGAIN
The guys placing these ads are using Adblockers themselves ... it's the only explanation.
Hey, he's got the support of 2800+ dead voters!  
Because this sub reddit has a poor petty douchebag to active user ratio
...You know, I just might.
I think there are some crazies out there who like the idea that the animal ones are "natural". But I don't want to get into a homeopath argument again. 
Yes, I am a programmer.
1) Doesn't matter, they want to make money and the RIAA will control them.  2) I bet you any amount of money you want to wager they do as I say they will.  3) cause? You mean their new houses.  4) If the RIAA has sense they will just buy out the sites that pop up.
*Ouch.*
Awesome article
OK, nitpick mode on. "the same number of tasks" is the wrong question. I think you mean computations per second, don't you?  A relatively small vacuum tube computer can perform the same number of tasks as any modern computer, it just takes longer and would probably be restricted on the scale of data it can work with. It's one of the things Alan Turing established way back in the dawn of computing.
The boy is 15, give him a break.
MIB
Yeah, and during his concerts, he was using fucking dancers on the stage and shit. And he wasn't the only person dancing in his videos either.  Yeah, we know he wasn't a singer-songwriter.
I don't know anything about LUA but using "range" (for i in range(1, k+1): ) is not that smart? python creates an array with objects and iterates that array when range is used. Use "xrange" instead. Python is slow but you should be aware how it works internaly
***NARWHALS!!!! FUCK YEAH!!!!***
Maybe you should expand your arguments to more than assertions.
The peanuts one made me throw up in my mouth
OJ - overwhelming evidence that he murdered someone.  For starters, the case *began* with evidence (dead bodies), which *lead* to a subsequent investigation.  OJ got off because the police shot themselves in the foot on more than a dozen occasions.  Were you even alive when that trial happened?  I remember it clearly.  He got off on technicality after technicality, with fucking Judge Ito throwing out every useful piece of evidence because it was all tainted or inadmissible thanks to the kind folks at the LAPD.  In contrast, both accusations against MJ lacked any evidence at all, and investigations occurred because complaints were filed, not because there was evidence of wrongdoing.  Investigations which turned up nothing, which is why he was acquitted when he went to trial.  In both cases, someone was out to get rich. Read about the case, instead of just jumping on the "OMG MJ is a perv hehe" bandwagon.
To be especially picky:  I can't really see that well,  but that splice between feed lines doesn't look particularly well done;  also the lower line (the thick one) does not seem to be clamped to the mast and seems a little thick for this application (presumably 802.11).  Metal zip ties would be better than using hose clamps,  and more of them up the mast.  The mount to the roof is a little awkward,  but probably fine depending on the overall weight.  
Judaism is mainly ok with premarital sex. Your comment is **hilariously** inaccurate. 
Based on the invective that continues to be heaped on Palin long after the election is over, it seems to me that the socialist crowd are fearful that she is on a trajectory to the White House. The real question is whether she has the ability to clean up after the fiasco of the Obama administration.
She looks good!
The world is moving differently
In June?
I have never seen a 16 year old look like that. Were the times really that bad to make a 16 year old kid look like he's approaching 40?
Is it the department that tests software?
For what it's worth, I'm in Atlanta.
I'm of the mind set that I'll be pirating it unless they reveal I can still play lan games without a connection to the internet. Otherwise, I would happily buy SC 2.
Really? Weird... I tried reading both DMotR and Darths and Droids, and every comic that I saw pretty much made me happy that I stopped playing D&amp;D, and started playing narrativist RPGs instead. I know there's good stuff in D&amp;D for folks that enjoy that kind of thing, but this comic seems to lack showing any of the good aspects of the game. I can't imagine how comics about players who aren't into the game and are railroaded along by the DM makes for a good sales pitch.
LMAO you where probably too dumb to figure out how to close it.  I never user adblock and I have 0 problems
After looking at those slides, I'm hoping they will make a Night at the (Creation) Museum ... it would be fucking awesome!
Your facts don't apply to me or my area. Where I live, drivers will do their best to hit cyclists out of spite, or at least nudge them.  For me, it is safer to drive.
I think this was out of the return of the living dead.  Great movie. http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0089907/
Yeah, I guess. I felt bad about it. She did come across as being one herself. I don't expect anyone to take that as justification for my change of mind, however.  But it made me think about something I hadn't really thought about until that moment, which is why I posted this story here and it was that, yeah, *I'm* after a photograph and I don't care about how anyone else feels about it.  I should have cared. I've tried to justify *not* caring at the time by telling myself I got a lucky and decent shot out of the encounter, but it remains an image I'm proud of and upset about at the same time.  It was eight years ago so, although this thought process is still triggered by the image, I'm not about to turn into a neurotic, guilt-ridden therapy case over it. I did it, part of me regrets it, but I learned something from it.
I think the lack of citations was notable. Ginseng seems great, but I haven't seen much in the way of 'good' studies which really show much effectiveness. 
FFFFFFFFFUUUUUUUUUUUUU  Not really, but that's amusing that it was a statistic made up to test people's gullibility. And I was spot on with the number too. But what if THAT website is actually to test people's gullibility? Hmmm.....
About 80 years ago... unless your perception of society is derived from Fox News, TBN, and the like; in which case Creationists are the majority and there are only two possible belief systems.
This has been the driest and hottest June I can remember. Normally it rains every day of June and makes it so much cooler. 
I like to look at things this way.   In life, we make decisions that we are accountable for. Some of those decisions are good, and have a positive impact on others; others are bad, with corresponding negative impacts.  It is important that we are held accountable for our decisions so that we can improve as human beings. We should be proud of our accomplishments and learn from our failures so that we can grow as we go forward.  When a person's path is over, their stake in history set -- be it large or small, we all have one -- there is no more need for pride, shame, love, fear or prejudice. All we can do moving forward is remember their accomplishments fondly and pick up the pieces of, and learn from, their mistakes.  tl;dr: Make hit album. Be awesome musician. Embrace your talents. Don't sacrifice your childhood and spend the rest of your life being a kid. If you have a developmental problem (like you missed your childhood), work it out positively. Accept your skin color and body. Don't touch children.
&gt; man is bending inside the box with the amputee on top of him  Really?  Part of the trick involves an amputee?  That's pretty funny, because when I first saw this I thought to myself, "Hmm, there obviously aren't any places the rest of his body could hide, so he must be an amputee" but then for some reason I dismissed the idea, as obviously there had to be something less obvious than that...
Thanks for the constructive response.  However I don't necessarily agree with this:  &gt; Will I make more money selling the trees to a logging company, or by creating my own logging company and doing it myself? I would think you would **ALWAYS** make more money doing it yourself.  I would say the correct quantifier here is "sometimes" instead of "always."  If what you said were true, there would basically be no specialization in any country (a fundamental property of capitalist economies).  Since an organization might focus on researching logging technology, hiring logging experts, etc. it's reasonable to conclude that *at least some of the time*, they will do it better than you could do yourself.  Otherwise no company would ever hire any other company to do anything (they would all do their own payroll, inventory, marketing, accounting, etc.)
No.  The system is untenable because it is immoral to rob people to pay for health care.
yeah I mean everyone knows that the universe magically popped into existence 13.73 billion years ago... duh
HIGHLY necessary.
One star wars story I read states that Jabba the Hut can see ultraviolet light.  Probably the signs are painted in multiple colors to make sure all sorts of aliens and humans can read them.
omgoodness i want to flick your nipples
&gt; Wtf? In other games they call that a "defect". I'm just saying..  MGS is not "some other game".  I suggest you play, I think it was MGS1 that had the controller switching, and see for yourself.  It's weaved smoothly and artfully into the story.  It's not a defect at all.  It is art.  It's what games should be.  I am not saying that all games should require you to switch the controller port, but they require that kind of out of the box thinking.  Without actually playing the game you can't really judge it very well.  At best you can offer a preliminary and hazy judgment.
No, but thanks for clearing that up.  I'll take your word for it.
That was just part of the article, to spice it up!
Another post from the Microsoft Mafia astroturfers on Reddit!!
The method used isn't very practical without asking the browser if it had visited a huge range of websites; all manually entered by the author.
I think the difference in prices is a lot less than it was a couple of years ago.
That's easy. Hands down and without any hesitation, it's Ewan Walker "The Physics of Conciousness" offers a bottom-up approach and is able to derive things from scientific principles such as the "rate" of consiousness, etc... He uses raw undesputed facts like estimated number of neurons, distance between them, number of acceptor molecules, and some quantum equations and he is able to DERIVE the minimum synaptic firing rate that brings about conciouisness. With this firing rate and other observed synaptic events, he's able to really take a good, hard look at what conciousness is.  Without just looking at it as a collection of neruons. This section processes emotion. This processes visual images. YAWN! How does it do these things? He goes a LONG way to maybe answering them. Conciousness is Quantum Mechanical. Micro-tubules? Yes. Think about what that means. It's pretty extraordinary actually. Free will is actually randomness then. When a scientist can derive observed phenomenon from quantum mechanics, he commands my respect deeply. Worth the read for sure.
Awesome! That was fast!
I'm not exactly praying for them to close, any more than I'm praying for London's Museum of Natural History to close. [incidentally, that one is free]. There are more important things to pray for, such as for Christians and non-believers alike to act in rational, respectful and kind manners, and for children to be able to grow up and after examining arguments and evidence, make up their own decision.   I think that's one prayer that anyone can get behind.
1: If you have trouble configuring the sound options under windows - you should not be using anything more complicated than a spoon.  2: *no binary blobs* - not possible.
Shot? Um.  No.  I'm sort of of the opinion that my freedom is not a license to do whatever I want to others.
Actual Foam filters DO filter out THC.
&gt;What a great movie.  Fixed. Wait, no -  &gt;What a terrible movie.  Fixed.
This entire page is weird.
With the tequila, you could do a chicken recipe.  It's probably not enough to marinate the chicken - but you could do what I did last Memorial day when I needed something on the fly - marinate a combination of yellow onions, green/red peppers in the tequila and grill it up and serve with the chicken.
What's the one where brixx pizza is?
that's even worse lol
I beg to differ.  I am not aiming to do romero style zombies, or make an action game.  What I want is very similar to silent hill, or resident evil.  I know what you are saying, and appreciate the input; but, the stuff that they have doesn't lend its self to the genre that I am looking for.
No hook. You need something else.  I would switch the paragraph around. Speak about your main character first and then pan backwards, outwards.
Needs more horse.
Alex Roy got started, and as far as I know still runs, in the Gumball 3000. It's a celebrity (mostly) rally that runs through various countries around the world and it's entertaining as hell to watch if you can find any of the movies or tv shows. Alex is known for dressing himself and his car up like the police and he's even pulled over a few other racers.   * http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=lscPOo_98y0 * http://www.gumball3000.com/
Brave General. Hope he doesn't travel on any planes from here on out. 
"When I take physical matter and apply your idea to it ('the first thing'), that's wrong. But when you take magical objects ('spirits' and 'God') and apply your idea to it, that's acceptable?"  Nope. I never said that. I said it's a POSSIBLE ALTERNATIVE, although unnecessary to explain the world.  Now you are changing my words to make it sound like I'm hypocritical. That's dishonest. And then you give insults.  Oh well... I guess all atheists are atheists for a reason. Too busy pretending to be better than everyone else.
&gt;They know that Joe won't pay  Excuse me? How does a retailer know whether a customer is a tax cheat or not?
If Shakespeare can make up words, so can I. 
Because a specific denomination or specific church/mosque/synagogue/temple **can** give you a definitive option.
Hahah, more of this please!
No shit. That's why he said he wanted it on a Mac and used the word "too". "Too" is referring to those that already have it: most likely Windows users
ENERGY LEGS
Here is a free WYSIWYG editor to allows you to make your own website easily
I'm in, i suggets we try a political party for funding, since it's going to be very dificult to get the media companies to display any atheist message from a private group. Remember most media companies in mexico belong to the right.
It should be for reddit-specific submission only. Things about reddit (suggestions, complaints, explanations of the alien(s), reddit mentions in the MSM, etc.) or at least related to online social communities.
£25 million a year is a FUCKING LOT OF MONEY.
Change I can believe in?  Psh, yeah right.
The Mushroom Men soundtrack by Les Claypool
hmm, true..
No, I don't. Nor does it really come up that much. But when it does (like in Hangover the movie here that one guy loses his tooth!) I just get that creepy crawly feeling that people here describe. It's not as pervasive as other people's feers. 
Fair enough, I can settle for Baal and Moloch.
There is definitely a speed increase on Mac. *Especially* scrolling! (e.g. long reddit comment pages)
nothing wrong with licensing a name.  Thanks for the tip, I thought UPS had bought out Mail Boxes ETC.
When people mention homeopathy, I lose all respect for them.
still useful regardless
This isn't *that which shall not be named*
Less% is still a big bite of their huge pies.
Grooveshark has a nice selection of music, even some of the more obscure stuff. Correct me if I'm wrong, but it doesn't have an upload option, which I was hoping could be used for Redditors to upload music they made themselves. Not trying to be picky, just want to make everyone happy. 
[Tim Berners-Lee](http://www.w3.org/People/Berners-Lee/)
It's better than the alternative.  In some of the critical legislation, every single vote counts.  Hopefully Kennedy and Byrd recover quickly and fully.  
one more thing, not every recruiter is identical and some of the stuff said won't be the same for other recruiters and regions. take it with a grain of salt.
&gt; was the first adult i ever met who wasn't up my ass  Does this phrase mean something different in America?
T-Paw just signed the cert  http://kstp.com/news/stories/S1005610.shtml?cat=1
I don't see any negative number for Kirk ;)  And yes my vote goes for Picard, because he is just all kinds of awesome.  I would vote Spock, Bones, Scotty, Worf, Data, Deana or Geordie over Kirk tbqh.
50% of humans are female, so that makes sense.  Still, should 4 year olds really be using them?
Oh just wondering. I'm from Kansas City. It's a big highway. 
moar pictures!!
Yeah, he makes a couple of good points but I thought that was pretty retarded also. The best musicians are doing it because they fucking love to play, they are happy if they can make ends meet from doing what they love - but you can't create real music with money as your sole motivation. Then all you create is shit.
the secret of the monkey island 2: le chuck's revenge.
You keep comparing it to MLB, he wouldnt hit 500 hrs if he played MLB.  Hank Aaron may not have 868 hrs but he would have with ease and probably over 1000 if he played in Japan.   Look at all the 3rd rate MLB players that go over to Japan and lead the league in HRs.
Worst.
All good points, and I completely agree, except that I don't think all thoughts are necessarily "conscious."
Sorry, there are two horses in this race: Melbourne or Sydney.  We'll keep ignoring SE Qld until it becomes the largest city in Australia as Brisbane, Ipswitch and the Gold Coast start to join.  And when it does... I'm afraid it's going to be an infrastructure poor city like Sydney more than intelligent Melbourne.
"Extra education can never hurt."  This is true.  But make sure you pick something you care about, or the student loan burden can keep you from going back and learning something really worthwhile.
I'm sorta the same way with mirrors.  Especially in the middle of the night when I'm groggy and out of it, I always expect some horrible thing to appear in the mirror, so to calm my fears I have to look into the mirror for several seconds to make sure there's nothing there.  Side note - mirrors in dreams can be really freaky, especially if you're lucid.
Great video.  Thanks for finding it posting it.
..&amp; he's actually involved in a sly business maneuver whereby he will be able to make a huge amount of money off of pirated versions of his own songs &amp; someday return, wealthy, debt free..&amp; MAYBE having altered his appearance.
&gt;for an **annual fee** you get two day shipping for no additional charge (i.e. "free")  79 or 89 USD is a lot of money. And not everything is covered, either.
WTF! Dude jumped out of fucking helicopter to put a submission hold on a giant writhing stag...can someone please explain why they didn't just shoot it with a tranquilizer?
Antivirus scanners suck because they work off an imperfect mechanism. Better to use an HIDS system such as Outpost Security or even free versions of Zone Alarm.
You're correct. Arimasen and imasen are negatives of their respective meanings. As for sega...  I'll say this. LiveMocha is a pretty bad place to start. At least, that's what I think you're using. I'd grab a textbook (you can "obtain" these on the internet) like Genki or Minna no Nihongo. You'll learn much more than using LiveMocha.  The problem with LiveMocha is that it's geared toward multiple languages. So it starts with basic sentences like "he is small", or "she is fat". Sounds like a good place to start right? Wrong. In Japanese, this is the worst possible place to start as it brings in difficult grammar for the beginner to grasp at such an early stage.  To answer your question though, sega is actually two words. "Se" and "ga" which is a particle that carries some connotations with it. See? This is why I said it was a bad place to start. "Se" is height, and "sega" is really only used in a sentence when describing someone else's height. Like a fellow human being's. At least, I've never heard it being used for anything else.  Like a poster below mentioned, I strongly recommend you look at http://www.guidetojapanese.org/. In my opinion, it's the most well-written resource on Japanese on the net. It's a little short (still pretty long) because it can't cover everything, but it'll get you started on the right track.
I did peruse our short prior post's presuming a mutual, seeing the same color chair, point of reference. Paganism into Christendom has lead away from Christ toward a pending false NWO. For someone who claims to have read the bible multiple times you either missed or simply refuse the point.Knowing full well prophesy (evidence) fulfilled along with prophesy pending (evidence) is looking much like the whirlwind of our day.The plethora of web sites you shall refute, for if not the LORD who's truth do you choose to believe and trust? For you seem only to trust in caesar's flesh not in GOD's Word. 
It's also what happens when you've actually built a friendship with a person outside of reddit. I suspect you might know a little something about that? 
Just search for the heading and enter via google, then you don't have to register. Of course inconvenient, but it works in cases were you are really interested in the content. Doesn't work with multipage articles though.
Exactly. You don't mention the default. You never say "that guy I know who's average sized with all his limbs, no remarkable speech pattern and clothes that could belong to anybody."  Now if you knew someone who's 6'6'', you'd describe him as "you know, that tall guy".
Does anyone else like being lulled to sleep by a thunderstorm?
Heaps.  Because if I don't there's no reason to live here.  **Edit**:  Did I really say 'heaps'? I guess you can tell I was from a heaps good city originally.
Cut it up and cook it
You know you *can* edit titles now.
They totally burned you, dude.
the video shows what seems to be the correct history of WWI, WWII and all other wars on the same region since the beginning of the 20th century.
¿Haz considerado unir esfuerzos con la gente de ateosmexicanos.com? Me parece que ellos ya habían hecho algún trabajo para "traer" autobuses ateos a México.  Es una comunidad en línea bien establecida. Pensaría que es más fácil trabajar con ellos, que empezar de cero.  Por otro lado, estoy dispuesto a donar a la campaña, pero debes admitir que la página [http://soyateo.org.mx/](http://soyateo.org.mx/), no inspira confianza. Sin afan de ofenderte, o de afectar la campaña, al parecer tu eres el único que la respalda hasta ahora. Nada me garantiza que mi donación se usará para el propósito indicado.  Creo que es mejor formar la comunidad primero y pedir donaciones después. Empezar pidiendo donaciones se presta a interpretaciones.
&gt;Your explanation of science is lovely until you hit '4'.  This is not *my* explanation of Science. This is the very [definition](http://dictionary.reference.com/browse/scientific%20method) of Science. In fact I challenge *you* to provide a definition of Science that does not include a reference to the practice of experimentation.   Do not claim to have Science on your side when you cannot even properly define the term.
Actually it is still commonly used in many Muslim countries.
All Hail Discordia!!!
So I guess whoever wrote this article is implying they are not a good linux user?
Ahh! I'm drowning, get me a lifevest!
Exeptions for gun collectors, competitive and recreational shooters.  Thats almost everybody.
PESHI GHANDI
Well yeah, that's a given. 
These people just collectively wiped their ass on the world's poor.
anyone else having problems with imgur? It always defaults to the homepage rather than loading an image... just started happening
Use third-party JavaScript-based services Google Analytics to confirm it.  Bots don't usually handle JS well enough to trigger as visitors.  That being said, there is a huge contingent of actual IE6 users.  Most of them are stuck in corporate hell.  Web apps I develop, with a target audience of the Fortune 500 officeworker, see IE6 responsible for about 70% of all visitors.  Which sucks for me.
What an arbitrary selection of religions. Hinduism is huge, and not mentioned. Judaism is tiny, and is in there. Roman Catholicism is only one branch of Christianity. What's the logic behind these four choices?
Wow there is some real hate in this thread.
I'd recommend reading reddit programming some.  Preferably before you post since this question is asked weekly.
No, that's a QA.
No, but that would imply that he's played 20 horrible NES games and decided to tell the world about it... which pretty much puts him lower on the evolutionary scale than the dude dressed as Mario submitting his high scores to Nintendo Power.  That's why he's a goon. :)
That's actually how Slashdot got its name. From the Wikipedia [article](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Slashdot).  &gt; The name "Slashdot" is described by the site's owners as "a sort of obnoxious parody of a URL", chosen to confuse those who tried to pronounce the URL of the site ("h-t-t-p-colon-slash-slash-slashdot-dot-org").  Useless trivia FTW!
http://farm3.static.flickr.com/2327/1969988234_202eb3386e.jpg?v=0  Pretty sure that's a real doll.
I just played a couple of games on the javascript games website that the guy under us posted. They're not bad, I played a version of Mario Kart that ran smoothly. Nonetheless, here's hoping for a &lt;canvas-deferred&gt; :p
AP is funded by Chavez? That's really news to me.
...
If you built a public persona based on fighting for the little guy and then you sold out, and to make that sell out successful you don't want to lose the support of that little guy, what would you say? Don't worry - be happy? People got totally sucked in by TPB, they have always profited by enabling copyright theft which is why they lost their case. The whole Robin Hood routine has always been spin. 
Two guesses:  - the closest speedometer to the person in the passenger seat is the one on the GPS. - the speedometer on the dashboard might not go up to the speed that they are driving.  As for the lighting, I'm not sure. I thought that they panned from the view out the window to the speedometer.
been at a credit union for..... probably near a decade now? had my card suspended once while traveling (i travel a lot) now I just let them know, not had any problems since.
Excellent!
Downvoted for saying bad things about cats.  Never say bad things about cats.
Starwood Preferred Guest AMEX &amp; Marriott Rewards Premier Visa.  Now these cards do have annual fees but I travel a lot for work so it works out for me. I haven't personally paid for a hotel room in about 3 years now and I've been able to stay at some pretty amazing places for free.  I used to use airline credit cards but then I figured out you could convert SPG &amp; Marriott points into frequent flyer miles so I've stopped using them. I've gotten quite a few first class flights on Singapore Airlines, ANA, Cathay Pacific and Emirates out of my airline and hotel cards(mostly it's from actual flying/hotel stays but the cards help out too).   Not for everyone but it works for me.
OMG &lt;refrains from using cuss words&gt;  Mountaintop removal destroys forests and animal habitats (do you not f~cking care about this?) and sends sludge into rivers, killing everything in them. The barren landscapes aren't just fleeting and momentary. Those pictures you showed me were of grasslands. What lives on a grassland? What animals? F~cking no animals do. Animals live in forests. You can't just blow up mountains. This is totally disrespectful to everyone and everything. These people should be in jail. Or worse.
Every single rapper? That's a lot of people. Plus Sharpton and Jackson. 
&gt;learn race relations from a sitcom.  yes because the people who wrote it went to university and studied human flaws to create an award winning show that also incorporates humour based around witty observation. they don't get paid thousands for fun.  &gt;Grow up a bit, and let's talk again in a few years.  you forgot to add noobs onto the end.
Ah.  (Interesting fact: the actor never had a tooth there, just born without it)
Kill myself? Pfft I would high-five myself.
the complimentary strip search
The fuck was that?  edit: I've just discovered a very strange world  edit: I think [this is their leader](http://farm4.static.flickr.com/3585/3355913492_ed5e466f4b_o.jpg)
Those are just the ones that died of old age waiting on Coleman to act his age.
Nuke Israel.
&gt;authentic Korean  As opposed to those Chinese knockoffs?
&gt;befriended  I kept reading that as "beheaded" and couldn't understand why the rest of your story was so normal.  I guess whenever I think about homeless people staying at people's houses I think beheading.
You sure it wasn't Emmanuel Radnitzky, noted for his photograms, which he renamed rayographs after himself?
&gt; It's bad for communities because people who work in your community lose their jobs when they can't compete with Internet companies.  So they move to where the jobs are located ... where the internet retailer is located.  &gt; This drives local retailers out of business. This hurts the local economy (people who used to work at those local businesses can't, the local landlord gets no rent and thus can't shop in the area, etc.).  No, as I stated above it simply shifts the location of the economy.  &gt; It's great that you like to shop online. I do too, sometimes. But having local retailers is great too, because then I can lay my hands on things, see if I actually like them, etc.  Good for you. For most things I purchase, I could care less. Don't push your own personal preferences on everyone else. In summary, the last thing we need is another massive federal bureaucracy controlling sales around the country. One state has no right to collect taxes from a business located in another state. If you try to force that, you are intruding on the rights of states to govern themselves.
This sounds like it would be an awesome hangover cure.  Also, NASA should sell more of the stuff they use in space. I would totally be a regular customer.
Did anyone make a comment about the skillet would require?
Oh no! Your nightmare is coming true!
I was gonna point that out. What the fuck? Why not wait another couple of months and make it a whole year. It's more like 9 months already! OK, at least 8 anyway.
It's a hoax.   1) The poster states their name is Byun-Tae. This means PERVERT in Korean and no one would name their child "pervert." Especially in such a sexually-repressed culture.  2) Although the person does not hint to what their gender is, it is interesting to note that Byun-Tae is a feminine gender word or "name" and not masculine. Byung-Tae would be the male equivalent. This person (probably  unknowingly) claims to be a girl.   3) Also, South Koreans cannot write English as articulately as its written. Anyone that has been on b.net knows this!   3a) Ask any South Korean to say "unparalleled" and you will see why they would never use the word.
Common doesn't make it healthy.   If you cared enough about eachother, you'd work to change the prejudice.  The homosexuals are working on it, why can't you?  Plenty of people have stood up to society for love.  You being afraid of society says more about you than society.   Again; just because someone else has done it doesn't make it healthy.  And no, you being full siblings isn't social prejudice, it's genetic bad news if you accidentally get her knocked up. You are potentially hurting your sister if she has to choose an abortion, or a baby that will be genetically deficient (as in; not genetically diverse and more prone to certain diseases and ailments). Any one of the above wouldn't have me calling a person's relationship unhealthy, but combined they make me say you have an unhealthy relationship with your sister.  Edit to add: I find the thought of two guys having sex creepy as well, but that doesn't mean I'm prejudice towards them.  I also find eating snails creepy, but lots of people find it a delicacy.  
neither DP nor Logic support VST, so I am hanging on like a bastard dingleberry trying to find out WTF this guy wants.
&gt;The bible also claims that the earth is flat and covered by a glass bowl, with water above and below.  Where is that, exactly?   I ask because Israel/Palestine didn't live in a bubble and the educated individuals in that region were more than likely aware of the spherical earth theories that were [beginning to take hold.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Flat_Earth#The_Classical_world_-_Greece_and_Rome) Just making sure you actually have solid evidence, and aren't [pulling shit out of your ass,]( http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Flat_Earth#Early_Christian_Church) or coming to the table with bullshit things your professor said in passing. Cause that would be painting with a broad brush just so you don’t have to be challenged by a more complicated history &amp; society than you care to comprehend…  
I'm sure you're safe here.  Just give me your address. 
Refresh, refresh, refresh, and more refreshing!
Read some [real news](http://www.haaretz.com/hasen/spages/1096951.html). They were warned and attempted to land in Gaza anyway. The ship was forced to an Israeli harbor where the crew was detained. They say that the aid on board the ship will be transported overland to Gaza and the crew will be deported.    EDIT: Just for the record, I do oppose the occupation of Gaza and the blockade, but nothing is going to get solved if the facts are washed over with emotion.
It seemed to only pull my internal IP and the rest of the info from my ISP's DHCP server, which was evident when it incorrectly listed my DNS servers; I use OpenDNS and the DNS server should have been my router's internal IP, as it actually acts as the DNS server on my network by proxy.   In other words, that was less impressive than the PHP script.
* Old Spock vs New Spock vs Data  I personally hate Vulcans, as they're pretty much space elves, and elves are assholes. However, I like Leonard Nimoy, so Old Spock wins.  * Old Chekov vs New Checkov vs [Wesley](http://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/TheWesley)  Wesley loses. Even Wil Wheaton hated Wesley. As for which Chekov, apparently the new Chekov makes the fangirls' panties moist. At the very least there are more female Star Trek fans.  *  Old Scotty vs New Scotty vs Geordi  New Scotty is played by [Simon](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Shaun_of_the_Dead) [Pegg](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hot_Fuzz). New Scotty wins. All other arguments are irrelevant.  * Old Uhura vs New Uhura vs Troi  Old Uhura doesn't really have a reason to be on the ship. New Uhura actually has a reason to be on the ship, but is stupidly oversexed. Troi is inextricably tied to new-agey bullshit. Troi loses.  * Old Bones vs New Bones vs Beverly  I'm not familiar enough with TOS to judge Old Bones, but I liked New Bones. Beverly loses for being Wesley's mother (guilt by association). New Bones wins for now, unless Old Bones was even more deliciously bitter and misanthropic.  * Riker (no beard) vs Riker (beard)  [Duh.](http://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Main/GrowingTheBeard)
I have heard comments that Firefox is annoying because there are so many updates. Just saying that lots of updates can alienate users.
I dont get it. 
That's why you only use the left lane for passing people, not for general driving purposes, no matter how fast you're going.
It already exists, And FYI Sam Keith is still making comics. *Zero Girl* is pretty damn cool, *Ojo* is plain creepy. *Epicurious the sage* is a bit goofy but has some great art and a bits of brain candy. If you've ever checked out *The Sandman* by Gaiman, he did the first 5 comics... So Um, did I mention I really like Sam Keith?  Oh, he also did a continuation called *friends of the maxx...*
&gt; 2: no binary blobs - not possible.  He means closed-source driver/firmware-wise. And it absolutely *is* possible.
If the alternative was selling exclusive rights to market hypersonic homing torpedoes to the American public, then yes.
Is that the same as "bend over and kiss your ass good buy?"
Oh, I'm sure.
Yes, there should be nothing pornagraphic about sex.
I guys the ending is what is making you feel bad?  Tell him what you did and why you did it. If he likes you, he should understand and he won't care.
The New Gateway M-1631u.  Laptop it has AMD Turion™ 64 X2 Mobile Processor TL-60 (2.0GHz, 512KB x 2 L2 Cache, for the processor with ATI Radeon® X1270 graphics with 256MB HyperMemory™ graphic hardware, match for business people. Included with Genuine Windows Vista® Home Premium SP1. This laptop can give you fast response because it has 4GB of memory. follows the full specs.
ooochey mama
[I like watching the puddles gather rain](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dYlAwvz8uwc)!!
In Catholic school, we were told that "The Bible says that God created the earth, but it doesn't say how".  Keep in mind that no one takes the Bible literally, even the people who claim they do - there are too many contradictions for that to be possible. 
Seconded. I just installed a similar theme so that it would stop making my eyes bleed.
what does it say on her right wrist?
That's strange. Phonon has supported pulse on kubuntu 9.04 and fedora 10/11 for me.
How about local networking?
The Total Annihilation soundtrack by Jeremy Soule, best listened to in game since it changes depending on whether you are in a big battle or just picking up the pieces.  Katamari On the Rocks from Katamari Damacy. Sometimes I just leave my playstation on at the menu screen so the song loops over and over.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kgrnIBlxZCk
Is it a optical disk format that stores up to 50GB per disc?
How can we make our dissatisfaction more clearly known?
I don't think so.   PG is a trademark I thought of the MPAA or whoever it is that rates stuff.   And I'm sure that saying any swear word one time gets you bumped minimally to pg-13.  Or did before the MA-nn/R thing changed.
.. or even imdb links.
Is it immoral to let someone die so that others may keep their wealth?
Imagine Picasso, Janis Joplin and Franz Kafka going through Human Resources.  Spectacular writing about what it takes to "get a job".
Care to elaborate? Or come to think of it, you're probably just full of shit! 
[Hmm](http://www90.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=how+much+wood+would+a+woodchuck+chuck+if+a+woodchuck+could+chuck+wood%3F)
Islame.
Please. Both Gore and Coleman could have continued their legal battles.  You just can't argue around the fact that Gore extended it for a month and Coleman has being going on 8 months now.
I kinda like GOD DNE
i think you, me and some other guy are the only three people that bought and played that game
Jet Grind/Set Radio
How so? I just see a delete [yes/no] link
"We the people" have much less, AGAIN!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
*Making that much requires a tremendous degree of talent and intelligence*  Can we PLEASE stop saying that the wall-street wizards had either?  Reality sort of shows that damn near all of them didn't know what the hell they were doing.
You misuse your semi-colons over and over again. They should be used sparingly even when they are used correctly. In fact, there are quite a few errors in this passage. Content is meaningless when your sentences are worded and structured incorrectly. It makes for third-rate writing. 
you could probably give it a middle finger with a min-width and two floats.
Outcast  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=M26n2gGV7FA&amp;fmt=18
Social anxiety has always been my weak spot. I'd still feel like eyes were following me if I was alone in the desert. It's usually caused from being overly aware of your surroundings and the constant fear of being judged by people that don't even notice you. Stuff like Zoloft helps curb these fears. From what I've experienced with it, I still feel like I'm being judged from eyes all around me, but I don't give a shit. The only downside is *very stiff (rigid) muscles, high fever, sweating, fast or uneven heartbeats, tremors, overactive reflexes, nausea, vomiting, diarrhea, loss of appetite, feeling unsteady, loss of coordination or headache, trouble concentrating, memory problems, weakness, confusion, hallucinations, fainting, seizure, shallow breathing or* (sigh) *breathing that stops.*
Are you a 70 year old arcade veteran?  If so, its time too die off and make room.
Interesting site.  &gt;Buddhism is also about respecting other living beings, living peacefully with everyone and being righteous in one’s actions, deeds and thoughts.  Interesting concept. 
You could try asking some of the mods who run the other subreddits. I know the "listentothis" subreddit has disabled downvotes.  EDIT: That, or ask on the "reddithax" subreddit.
It's hard to debate someone as ignorant as you...  Let's try this:  Prove that Santa doesn't exist.
&gt;In a functional democracy if the president commited a crime you send the police, arrest him and give him a fair trial, where he has the right to defend himself.  I'm sorry, but this fantasy world needs to stop.  Can you name a U.S. president that has *ever* been arrested while in office?  Harding?  Nixon??  Clinton?  *Bush Jr*?
Something to share in class.
"Fuck the faggoty poster, not the faggoty post".
Correct. I guess I should have described it as "businesses collect sales tax" instead of "sales tax is paid".
I'm going to stop you right at _slippery slope_.  That phrase is not a license to use ridiculous straw man arguments.  A recipe involving vitamins, sugar, and water is not a national security threat.
It may just be that she doesn't like you in the same way anymore and either doesn't know how to say it or doesn't want to hurt you. It sounds like she's comfortable with you (outside of sexual intimacy), so she still wants to cuddle and fall asleep with you. She could be viewing you as a safety blanket b/c of how long you've been together.        However I could be wrong about that. You could very well be right about the birth control issue, which was my first thought...until you mentioned that she only gives you pecks on the cheek and is uncomfortable when you touch her sexually. Those were huge red flags telling me that she may have fallen out of love, infatuation, whatever she felt for you.       The best thing you can do is to sit her down and talk to her about what she's been feeling. Make her tell you. *You* deserve to know what's going on with her after 1.5 years. Sounds like you two have had a pretty adult relationship up until this point, so you should have an adult conversation with her. Don't let her dismiss it either. Find out what's going on so that you can move on to someone who *will* want you as much as you want her and not waste your time on someone who may not reciprocate your feelings. Good luck man, it's a hard situation to be in, but once you know what's going on with her, you'll be able to deal with the situation and move on *or* fix what needs to be fixed. And if it's just something like stress or birth control, then you'll know and won't have to worry about it anymore.
Doesnt this just make you want to throw him against a wall?
It's got more support on the right rather than the left because of economic and environmental issues, respectively.
Ain't it that bald english comedian popular for his "pub landlord" character?
When I was a child my Dad opened a local credit union account for me.  I have never used any other bank.  The thing that impressed me most was the time I accidentally left my ATM card in the machine and walked away.  My entire $2,000 checking account was emptied in a day.  The bank refunded all the money immediately and said that if they found out I was lying I would be in trouble.  I can't see that happening at a major bank without tons of red tape.
make it expensive? gateway drug? suka ma cock you fallacious statements!!! other than that, pretty legit bra
RecruitingBlogs is the social network for the recruiting industry.
[Study up, smartass.](http://www.jewishvirtuallibrary.org/jsource/Judaism/sex.html)  *"This is not to suggest that Judaism approves of pre-marital sex or promiscuity. Quite the contrary: traditional Judaism strongly condemns the irresponsibility of sex outside of marriage. It is considered to be improper and immoral, even though it is not technically a sin. In fact, to prevent such relations, Jewish law prohibits an unmarried, unrelated man and woman from being alone long enough to have sexual relations. But these laws come from the Talmud and the Shulchan Aruch, not from the Torah."*
The Bible!  *Thanks, Kansas Public Schools!*
i went to a catholic school, we had a specific lesson on how bad masturbation is, and you'll go to hell if you do it.  Definitely red.
Wow I forgot about that series entirely. How funny.  I don't mean to say Voyager is insignificant - just that it really never crossed my mind.
Grow up.
So in other words, just don't check *yes* when you get to the box that says: " Will you use this firearm to commit a crime?"
[Adagio for Strings](http://www.playlist.com/searchbeta/tracks#adagio%20for%20strings%20samuel%20barber)
&gt; This didn't hit the main page.. It's in the little top box that alternates between sponsored links and links that have just been submitted.  Which is *on the main page.*  &gt; You still have some voice in what hits the main page.  True, but not in the way that really matters to me. I no longer have veto power over really stupid, really bad content. If that ad is running, nobody does. The marketers and advertisers are in control now. Not the users.  &gt; This also isn't the first time. Reddit has been doing this style of sponsored links for months. Many of them have been through doubleclick.  First time I've seen it, so it's the first time for me.  &gt; You don't seem to understand how reddit works.  To the contrary, I believe I have recently been enlightened as to *exactly how* Reddit works.  &gt; Maybe you should go somewhere else.  Indeed...
The majority of video players on linux do support ogv (maybe I should say every). Vlc also supports it on windows. This is not a hard video to play.
I wish I could frame your post :)
I guess they all say that. Was it Tim something?
Nothing there. Mirror?
"Limited by their numbers, Marines can hold out but not rout Taliban"
Mod Flanders wanted it this way. I wonder if there are any gas leaks yet? 
Generally pretty supportive of Gainey, but I'm not so sure on this one. Swap an underperforming $1.7m restricted free agent winger for an older underperforming $7.3m centre? And give up two of our prospects while we're at it? McDonagh was our first-round pick a couple years back, although Valentenko didn't seem to be doing much. This seems to be taking a big cap hit ($4m more than Higgins would've signed for) for not much improvement.
I left home about 24 years ago and have lived with a variety of people, some who were good friends to start with but were terrible housemates but none, I'm glad to say, were anything as bad as some of the ones people have described here.  Some things that some have done over the years though:  I lived in a hostel for under 25's after I got kicked out of home and..  * 1 girl used to turn her socks and knickers inside out so she could string out doing laundry for a while longer. * A guy's room really stank so everyone else [about 12 - 15 of us] forced our way in and cleaned it. We found half eaten food in a cupboard under his sink also with carrier bags he had used to defecate into, rather than go to the toilet 15 feet down the hall.  In shared flats, I've had to put up with..  A guy whose girlfriend decided she was going to move in [with 3 guys] and then proceeded to tell everyone how things should be run. She would eat everyone elses food, sit on her arse all day, smoking weed and watching daytime tv. I noticed that money, dope and other stuff of no importance to anyone else, would go missing from my room. With no evidence, I couldn't say anything until a couple of times, I was off sick and caught her walking into my room and then pilfering through my drawers, etc, making up lame arsed excuses when I asked WTF she was doing.  She did a low paid job in a shop and her BF decided that she didnt have to contribute anything to rent or bills [the 3rd guy had moved/was hounded out by this time] and that everything would be split 50/50 with me. When I finally moved out, he then said I owed him about £500 in unpaid bills, rent, etc. I heard that they were telling common friends about 2 years after we parted company, that the amount I "owed" was £2k.  On top of this, I was going through a terminal rocky patch with along term GF, who went off with another guy before we had completely split and my flatmates GF absolutely slagged her off as a dirty two-timing slut. About 6 months later, she was found out to be fucking one of her friends, in her 'conjugal bed', whilst my flatmate was at work!   Another flat about 5 years ago, I was working from home doing web dev when one flatmate came home. He stuck his head around my door to say hi but got no response as I was engrossed in code. So he went to the kitchen and got a saucepan and a wooden spoon to beat together, thinking it would be funny to scare me but just ended up giving me tinnitus in one ear. It took 3 months before he was finally convinced I wasnt making it up.  I now have a difference of 25dB SPL @ 8Khz between my ears and a constant high pitched ringing, still.  He would also do this thing of forgetting he had put washing in the machine for like 2 days so it would start to dry whilst damp. He would then hang it on a clothes horse and reek the flat out, but saying he couldnt smell it. The other flatmate called it doing a "donkey wash". Now if I'm on public transport and I encounter that smell, I cant help but fucking gag and want to stab them in the face. Usually ending up being quite vocal about it.  To counter this, I know I have been an absolute nightmare to live with at various times. Now I have lived alone for the last year and it's the best thing that I've done.
I am not an expert student of feminism, but I think that the first wave of the movement was a legitimate civil rights movement. This was in the 60's. I support that, just like most people did: the movement achieved equality in barely a few years and without any bloodshed (which is unheard of, in history). Starting from the 2nd wave and on, I don't support it.  You bring an interesting point: do women make our position more believable? It's a sad testament to human nature, but yes, I think they do. It really shouldn't matter, but it does: I think many people look with suspicion at those who are advocating for their own group.
I did not like Ishmael at all. It felt very dishonest to me, starting with the naming of the 'Leavers / Takers': the original names came from his deal where he presents the terms of a society and you either Take it or Leave it, but those were clearly not the connotations that he wants the readers to have in mind.  I felt like he started making errors after about page 93, too, starting with the man in the airplane in free fall.
You mean "misrepresents". I sure hope Miss Represents does not sue your sorry ass from here to Washington mate! ;-)
good, they can keep her
Really?  How?  *When answering the question please provide the source to the code that runs your CPU as it isn't generally available.  Documentation on the firmware update interface will get you bonus points.*
&gt; But i won't lie, once you have them set up the reassurance that you can cut swaths across your code, as long as the tests pass you haven't broken anything, is wonderful.  Sure, but what obout hte time spent fixing all those tests that you broke by cutting swaths across your code? The frustrating thing about tests is not just the initial investment in building them, but also maintaining them. 
"...in the center of the ring just like a circus..."
I think you're missing some perspective.  &gt; any calls to functions that take C strings will be at least twice as slow.  Not unless those functions are for string-manipulation.  Take `getaddrinfo`, for instance: time will be dominated in network latency, not CPU time to process the string.  For typical uses of strings with C functions--off the top of my head: `open`, `getaddrinfo`, etc--the strings will be small enough and the frequency of calls little enough to make the overall overhead of conversion insignificant, in all likelihood.  The only exception I can think of would be bulk data transfer, such as `read` and `write`.  I/O should still dominate, but if you're spending a lot of CPU time doing data transfer, the overhead of ropes could be significant.
Anyone actually notice any differences in their usual browsing?  I upgraded, and am only reminded that it's a new version every time I hit the reddit front page and see this article still sitting there.
Harvard School of Public Health says otherwise:  "Washington, Apr 28 (ANI): Smoking, high blood pressure and being overweight-these are the top three preventable risk factors for premature mortality in the United States, according to a new study.  Led by researchers at the Harvard School of Public Health (HSPH), the collaborative study found that smoking is responsible for 467,000 premature deaths each year, high blood pressure for 395,000, and being overweight for 216,000."
When I first heard that line I thought it was,  "Two can be a badass one".  Yes.
Nope, thats a bluray.
I don't like the way Alberta spends/ makes their money, but they have plenty of their own money.
Is that some kind of dance school?
Its true that she does have that luxury in the financial sense.  I would argue, though, that as far as reputation, public embarrassment, etc. goes, she's in the same position as any other political affair.   In fact, if you compare her situation to another average couple, where the husband cheats and is caught but neither the husband or wife are public figures and therefore don't risk public humiliation at the hands of multiple 24 hour news networks, Mrs. Sanford actually has it harder off, despite her financial independence.  So with that in mind I'd say she is especially commendable for her strength and independence, especially in a culture where that average couple might attempt to save their reputation in the same position but with a much, much smaller spotlight. edit: and I'm aware that none of that really negates the original argument. I just felt like it was taking away credit where I though credit was due.
I have a mac :( They need to hurry up on the port, for linux too.
Hey man at least you get booty. I've known a couple of guys that were in relationships (dating, not even married) and they would tell me that they could go between a month and 2 months sometimes without getting any.  I can understand how it becomes "less sexy" when it seems that you're partner is only doing it because they have to.  You gotta talk to her dude! With weighty matters such as this, it's best not to brood on it for too long without mentioning it.
I think it's "obese."
&gt;&gt;btw, it's "toe."   &gt;Maybe mariox19 is a tugboat.   Maybe Jenny Sanford is a tugboat.  There, fixed that for you.
I guess night riders are what we call in the UK, car-jackers. Our car-jackers attack any time of the day or night.
I suppose there are aesthetic concerns, in terms of existing mountains and forests, even if the final result looks _better_.  In any case, I think they don't really care about MTR beyond the shock value of using the 'before' pictures in their pamphlets.  Of all the things to worry about with respect to coal power, MTR is probably the most benign.
You have to treat them like wild animals. Don't provoke them no matter how offended you are. Even a little comment under your breath will have them rabid. You can't win a political war by fighting a single grunt. Lose the battle to win the war. Avoid the thugs, they are not the real problem, but its manifestation.
http://www.reddit.com/r/Music/comments/8wytq/bon_iver_for_emma_forever_ago/c0ap4j7  I'll update my original post.
Good God you're a right-wing wacko aren't you?
and i was like BONE BONE BONE.
Or commuter trains for that matter
Wow. That post showed up as 0 points as soon as I hit Submit. Looks like someone has an auto-downmod bot running...
if there was a "making babies with your wife" section, the catholics have that.  They're taught to be fruitful and multiply
awww, it's you again! that was a fantastic story, by the way :)
We're all thrilled for you.  Now go away until 2000 points.
&gt;Just consider banking.  I would, but it doesn't address the moral hazards associated with health care, so to use it in analogy has very limited use.  A problem in health care, unlike banking, is that in many cases it is much more profitable to let someone die. Economic competition will not thrive in unprofitable areas, and our society does not accept the concept, even though in reality it occurs often, where ability to pay dictates whether one lives or dies. Society's mores in health care conflict with free market principals.  There are many other conflicts including the fact that medicine is complex enough that an average citizen must take the word of the medical community, and when the medical community is profit driven, it is ripe for abuse. We see many abuses now in aspects of the "free market" medical community, including in big pharma.  I agree with Krugman that adverse selection and moral hazard are central to the enterprise, so much so that I don't expect free-market principles to be enough, and in that would also read that (as stated before), society's mores in health care conflict with free market principals, and government is in the best position to help.    edit: clarity
No, that's Al Murray
I'll up vote both cause I've actually been to El Guapo Cantina for fights.  Last time I was there I got to meet Mayem Miller too.  
Is it something wrong with my pc or is does the video only have sound on the left speaker. I've noticed this happening on quite a few youtube videos lately.
This is cool and all, but it's stuff like this that makes me concerned that Twitter wants to be Facebook and vice-versa. 
Not all bottoms are female.
He asked about the health insurance provider. 
I wouldn't say it's that lucrative for chargers. Car chargers might make a little more. This is definitely pro-consumer and also very eco-friendly.
The color scheme made my eyes hurt.
Going by the article the title was just made up.
Then they can expect continued resistance.
Oh wow, were Empire Carpet commercials really that big in the Chicago area?  My stepdad, who grew up in Chicago, has mentioned their jingle to me several times.
Who gives a ______?
I don't immediately block all ads on all web pages.  But, if it blinks, moves, covers what I'm trying to read, or is in any intrudes on actual content, I'll block all ads from that web site, forever.  F'em.
Total virtual reality is no fantasy, with advancements in brain research I am sure it will be possible. And looking at the success of WoW and other MMO's I am sure it will be the most successful thing ever.
I don't know if (warning: PDF) [this paper](http://technology.arc.nasa.gov/docs/ARC11943_rehyrdration_white_paper.pdf) is the same one, but it's a paper related to rehydration and it's from Ames Research Center (that's what `arc` in the domain name stands for).  EDIT:  Oh, and the principle author on the paper is John Greenleaf, who is also mentioned in [this NASA press release](http://www.nasa.gov/topics/nasalife/features/rehydration_beverage.html) about the beverage.  EDIT#2:  [Here's the patent](http://patft.uspto.gov/netacgi/nph-Parser?Sect1=PTO1&amp;Sect2=HITOFF&amp;d=PALL&amp;p=1&amp;u=%2Fnetahtml%2FPTO%2Fsrchnum.htm&amp;r=1&amp;f=G&amp;l=50&amp;s1=5,447,730.PN.&amp;OS=PN/5,447,730&amp;RS=PN/5,447,730).  The formula is "9.0 grams of sodium chloride, 15.44 grams of sodium citrate, and 0.72 grams of aspartame, all dissolved in a total of 2 liters of water", but according to the manufacturer's web page, it's "[Technology Exclusively Licensed from NASA Under US Patent #5,447,730](http://www.therightstuff-usa.com/)".  EDIT#3 (why not):  The PDF paper linked above is about this beverage.  I conclude this based on Table 2(a), which shows something called "HyperAde" that has the identical ingredients in the patent claim.
Creating decks isn't a game, nor is it fun.  Bioshock doesn't let you bore your own ammo.  Metal Gear Solid doesn't let you stitch your own camouflage.  Because *those things aren't fun.*  Which isn't to say hardcore enthusiasts of gun crap and paintball foolishness don't do both.  Yet... people spend far more time talking about football and their fantasy teams then actually playing the sport.  I'm sure nerds have many a fond memory of passing the hours at FurCon '99 organizing their decks on folding tables. Human nature's fucked up.
Comment from the Microsoft Mafia "perception management" team.............DOWN VOTED!!!  Microsoft Exposed: Perception management team on Digg/Reddit -  "Microsoft Exposed: "Perception Management" (another new term for "Shill") - Microsoft has a perception management team and specifically targets Web 2.0 sites like Digg and Reddit. Some of this is outsourced as well"  http://groups.google.com/group/comp.os.linux.advocacy/msg/f5c5ff7ffab701fb
I have six fifth degree black belts in joe son do.
No one has EVER emulated BNet have they.
FINALLY!
Glad I could help.  By no means is this question meant to be taken as an insult, but have you seen the "You suck at photoshop" video series?   If not, start with the beginning of the series and watch them in order, it will teach a ton of photoshop techniques in simple ways, while being entertaining due to the narrators back story and personal life.
DOH!
Yeah, I never even played Chrono Cross, but I thoroughly enjoy its soundtrack!
Im talkin about the rolled up bits of cardboard. 
Like the Dem's needed to promote more trash: Biden, Pelosi, Reid, Dodd, Frank, Kerry, Waters, Schumer, Rangle, Boxer, Feinstein, Murtha etc… Don't look so surprised in your FEMA cage!
Comment from the Microsoft Mafia "perception management" team.............DOWN VOTED!!!  Microsoft Exposed: Perception management team on Digg/Reddit -  "Microsoft Exposed: "Perception Management" (another new term for "Shill") - Microsoft has a perception management team and specifically targets Web 2.0 sites like Digg and Reddit. Some of this is outsourced as well"  http://groups.google.com/group/comp.os.linux.advocacy/msg/f5c5ff7ffab701fb
USA USA USA USA  What a fucking joke of a shithole we live in. Even the damned author was both critical of the union guys and happy he got 4 hours of pay for 5 minutes of work. You wonder why we are no longer what we once were?  There's a major reason, right there.
Upvoted for fuzziness.
I have no idea why you would say that, and I can assure you that I posted here because I needed people to confide in. It's really difficult to leave a support system, no matter how flawed, in exchange for nothing. I have been on reddit for years, and it has been the comments and posts here that have helped me reach a reasonable conclusion; I don't believe that I would have gotten here by myself. I have come extremely close to suicide, I have and continue to battle depression, and for me the support I have felt here even without posting until recently has carried me through. I have started to reason with my wife, who is a wonderful, amazing person, and I think that I have made some progress. And I really feel that a tremendous part of what I've done is because of the people here. So no, I am not trolling, not do I have any idea why you would accuse me of that. I created a username specifically for this conversation, yes; but because I cannot afford to be identified yet as who I am, and my posts previously would clearly link back to me.  
I agree with you. There's no way Demolition Man should be on the list. Taco Bell wasn't shown in the best light in that one. And with FedEx being used in CastAway, I don't think they were shown in the best light either. I mean, do you want to trust a company whose planes crash land on unknown islands and the castaways open your packages and make friends out of sporting equipment. The blogger should have used Transformers for every spot on the list.
And simulated stress is not stress how exactly? I already addressed that. Just because playing a game is a distraction from a greater stress in real life doesn't mean that you are relaxing while playing it.   Also, puzzles are nearly the definition of a casual game, and are not tied to the medium.
Is it a state of great gratification or exaltation, also movie starring Denzel Washington?
Probably because the US has not used the standard competitive market model for the last say, 70 years? No one ever says this because it doesn't fit in to either right or left political ideology, but the problem is not with the way we run insurance (i.e private vs. government run) but in the existence of medical insurance in and of itself, that is there is a big corporate or government entity that when the need arises is expected to pay the price of whatever the medical service provider and pharmaceutical company demands for services rendered, leaving no incentive to charge reasonable fees. Anyone with even a rudimentary understanding of economics can tell you this is a perversion of the normal economic model. Those providing the service do not compete with each other, rather the competition lies between middle men (insurance companies) that interact with all the same service providers. There are several factors related to the inflation of medical coverage in the United States. One is the amount of doctors available. The American Medical Association beginning in 1910, decided everyone would benefit from fewer, more highly trained doctors, and that medical schools should raise standards, tuition and improve facilities, the number of medical schools then dropped from 131 to 81, and of course the fee doctors charged went up. Soon after it was the American Hospital Association that expanded prepaid hospital service plans that had just been developed to the community level, a precursor to Blue Cross Blue Shield (set up in the 1930s) this eliminated the need for hospitals to offer competitive prices against each other, as they all began to pull money out of the same pool. Prices again went up. The real spike in health care inflation happened as a result of what happened in 1940-1960, when we went from under 20mil people insured to 140mil, or aprox. 75% of the country. After which, health care costs went up approximately 6.5% per year until 1970 and continued at a rate of 4% since, until it spiked at 90% in 2004 and then dropped to where we are now, at 85% covered. Despite advancements in technology that have made the same level of health care cheaper, and other methods such as outpatient care, the price of medical coverage is through the roof, but then again so are doctor’s salaries, hospital profits, and the markup on pharmaceuticals. If one eliminated health insurance from the equation, they immediately get a 20-30% drop in coverage prices because A) they are no longer burdened with the insurance industries 10% overheard or B) 10-5% profit margin, neither of which goes toward medical treatment, but furthermore eliminates C) the burden of insurance fraud which is levied on normal consumers and is not always caught (no insurance means no entity to defraud) Furthermore hospitals will not be able to charge $791 for a pair of $12 dollar stockings source as price competition between hospitals will be reintroduced, hospitals know that joe sick pack does not have the deep pockets that an insurance company or government entity does, and will be forced to charge a reasonable amount. Finally if one were to open to US medical field up to qualified foreign doctors, the price of physicians would go down, supply and demand. I posted this a while back on another thread, but now it seems that Nobel Laureate economist Milton Friedman agreed with me, [at least in principal.](http://www.hoover.org/publications/digest/3459466.html) Sources: [A history of the development of the US medical insurance industry](http://eh.net/encyclopedia/article/thomasson.insurance.health.us) [Journal of Economics and Finance - A Note on Health Care Inflation - PDF!](http://www.springerlink.com/content/x5v01477335q8r13/fulltext.pdf) [Horror Story of horror stories - Article about a 2.7 million dollar medical bill](http://online.wsj.com/article/SB119610495315004214.html) (yes, I have posted this before, but as long as people continue to make the same faulty argument, I will post the same rebuttal.) 
wtf
I would love it
And the FSM thusly spoke, by the end of your use of this car, you shall deny me. Not deny me once. Not deny me twice. But to deny me three times.  Ramen
Adblock is the second most useful invention after penicillin. And just barely. 
Now, I’m no Bob Villa, but as a new homeowner who has to replace his roof, I have been looking into environmentally friendly alternatives to either asphalt or “premium” wood. And Enviroshake definitely falls into the first category. Made primarily of reclaimed materials, Enviroshake might just be the answer.  Read more.   
SOULJA BOY SUCKS
What?
Who are you saying practices on toddlers and pregnant women?
The $31,600 doesn't have to be borne by individuals making $50,000. That's why I spoke in terms of GDP, to avoid discussions of individual plans or policies on paying for health care, and to focus on what the country as a whole can afford, given whatever taxations, regulations and policies are required to spread that cost to everyone as society deems fit.
Someone better call Reed Richards.
SOULJA BOY SUCKS
I agree the 'he' could be someone else besides the CEO, for example to writer of the article or statement in question.  //edited to remove the repeated use of the phrase 'in question'. In question.
I just installed 3.5-- is it me, or is there no longer an hourglass when you click a link (i.e. load a page)? This is kind of annoying because sometimes I completely miss when I try to click a link (when I'm tired or drunk). Now, I have to look all the way down at the status bar to see if the page is loading when a page hangs... it takes so much effort... someone help me get my hourglass back, please?  edit: added parenthesis for clarity
Me too! (I must have missed her filming this by only a few days)  Lovely pub.
[Insulated sleeve for coax,](http://search.digikey.com/scripts/DkSearch/dksus.dll?Detail&amp;name=6291-ND) for BNC. I don't know if the nut size is the same for F connectors or not. 
Do not apologize!  1) An accident--the condom slipped off inside me, and I took the morning after pill but it did not help. I had recently been taken off the pill by my doctor because of my migraines (I have switched to the progestin only pill now).  2) I did...but it is not 100% effective, as I learned the hard way.  3) I did not tell him; we were not together when I found out.  4)7 weeks  5)I would have gone to visit family in a state where it was legal.  6 and on:  Provided you are an adult, in MA there are really no requirements for first trimester abortions, save that you have the money to pay for the procedure. As I was an adult my parents did not need to be notified. I initially went to my usual doctor, who gave me a referral to Planned Parenthood.   You make an appointment over the phone, show up at the clinic, fill out medical history forms, and sign your consent. If you want to have any sort of drugs to relax you, they require you to have someone with you to take you home, or at least someone to pick you up.   First they do an ultrasound to make sure you are actually pregnant, and to determine how far along you are. Then you meet privately with a councilor, who asks you if this is truly your own choice, how you think you will feel after the abortion, if any of your friends or family know, and if the father knows. They also ask you if you think the father might harm you if he finds out about the abortion.   They ask you why you think this is the right choice, but the woman asked in such a way that it was clear she was not second guessing me, but rather giving me the opportunity to talk it out with her if I needed to. All in all, I was extremely impressed with the nurses and the doctor. One nurse held my hand the whole procedure. 
I'm sure there's a joke about a tricked-out DeLorean somewhere in there...
Salty drinks would not be refreshing. Sweet drinks can suck too, an example being Sprite. While Gatorade has enough sweetness to cover the sodium, most sodas go way overboard. My mouth feels like I chugged a bottle of syrup after drinking Sprite, it has way too much sugar.
[SRWare Iron](http://www.srware.net/en/software_srware_iron.php): based on Chromium sourcecode. Has an ad blocker built in, as of last November.  No flashblocker yet but hopefully sometime in the near future.
More? The government already pays for a lot of her crap.
METATHREAD MINDSPLOSION
One time I was at a party, and some guy pulled a joint out of his smoke pack with a cigarette filter in the end. I politely told him that that was a bad idea.  I wonder how long he had been smoking like that before?
I see infestor harass being really good. Not for mineral lines, but put a group of 3 or so on between bases for scout, and as the enemy approaches, Mind parasite a few units.
Could you summarize for us how it does this? I'm guessing that it tries to only show div's with common id's and names of actual content, like "content", "body", "article", etc.
I prefer chicks that do not smoke.
i've always heard:  when the lines on the screen make more lines in between...
The "us vs. them" mentality makes me sick to my stomach.  Regardless of your political views, to *want* a so called "super majority" is absurd.  Giving one power so much power is not a good thing.  Having somebody there to force some thought is a good thing.  They just passed the carbon cap and trade, and nobody read the friggin thing.  Now nobody will read anything. If the Republicans were spending like drunken sailors under Bush, Democrats will soon be spending like sloppy drunken sailors, who just snorted a line of coke 100 meters long.  
1. Change your resolution. 2. The Graphs count as content. 3. Remove the ads and you lose the staff writing the content. 4. If this petty crap gets you upset, you need to check your head.
eh, i'm sure it is, but what's the point of arguing about whether i or you or anyone knows anything about sex. just because i say i do or do not do something doesn't mean its true, and theres no way to prove it w/o pics, vid, etc.
Here's a second vote for the Etymotics. You might want to consider the ER-4P if you are planning on using it with a portable music player, like an iPod. I've lusted over my friend's ER-6i (their entry level buds) that he got a year ago, and am looking to get my own set of hf2's (kinda like the ER-4s but with an iPhone compatible mic+button). The ER-6is were perfect for classical music (for the price, which for new is in your price range), and the ER4s would suit you well too.
Yes Chicks don't play Starcraft.
&gt; The envelope is 255,87,0  Sorry, you must have made a mistake. Save [this](http://www.reddit.com/static/mail.png) and then follow along with me:   $ convert mail.png mail.xpm  $ cat mail.xpm  /* XPM */  static char *mail[] = {  /* columns rows colors chars-per-pixel */  "15 10 3 1",  "  c OrangeRed",  ". c #FF7500",  "X c gray100",  /* pixels */  "      ",  "  XXXXXXXXXXX  ",  " X XXXXXXXXX X ",  " XX XXXXXXX XX ",  " XXX XXXXX XXX ",  " XXX. XXX .XXX ",  " XX.XX   XX.XX ",  " X.XXXXXXXXX.X ",  " .XXXXXXXXXXX. ",  "      "  };   As you can see, the "convert" program even knows that the color is called OrangeRed. The envelope is made of three colors: OrangeRed (#FF4500), another unnamed color with hex #FF7500, and gray100. There's no mention of #FF5700, which would be your (255, 87, 0) claim. Perhaps you transposed the "7" and the "5" when typing them into your hexadecimal -&gt; decimal conversion program.
Good article explains what makes mortgage rates rise and fall.
love it! that, and seein a girl wet (aroused) is what always gets me 
&gt; the reassurance that you can cut swaths across your code, as long as the tests pass you haven't broken anything, is wonderful.  I find you get almost the same reassurance from a comprehensive set of functional tests.
Sorry, my initial post is quite vague.  Silene Capensis is it's name, well the name of the one I've used. Brew a tea and drink in the morning before eating for a couple of days at least.
Oh, fuck off.
Are you talking to yourself?
Vancouver based Cadent Computing Inc. today is delighted to announce wineCellar 2.0, a major update to their popular wine collection and organizer for Mac OS X and Windows. Perfect for wine aficionados and connoisseurs alike, Cadent wineCellar is a unique application for storing, viewing and retrieving information about anyones wine collection. Among version 2.0s new features is the ability to sync wine entries to the companys new synchronization service, Cadent Cloud.
Not when his skin was white.
None. My parents were (past tense) Scientologists. Despite all the other crap Scientology does, encouraging deliberate deception is not one of them. Being honest and up-front with your children (and everyone) is a basic tenet.  Along with, you know, being free to kill anyone the church designates as 'bad'. But we'll just gloss over that part...
its not pot that causes stealing its bread eating that causes stealing...  Whereas:   1. More than 98 percent of convicted felons are bread users.  2. Fully HALF of all children who grow up in bread-consuming households score below average on standardized tests.  3. In the 18th century, when virtually all bread was baked in the home, the average life expectancy was less than 50 years; infant mortality rates were unacceptably high; many women died in childbirth; and diseases such as typhoid, yellow fever, and influenza ravaged whole nations.  4. More than 90 percent of violent crimes are committed within 24 hours of eating bread.  5. Bread is made from a substance called "dough." It has been proven that as little as one pound of dough can be used to suffocate a mouse. The average American eats more bread than that in one month!  6. Primitive tribal societies that have no bread exhibit a low incidence of cancer, Alzheimer's, Parkinson's disease, and osteoporosis.  7. Bread has been proven to be addictive. Subjects deprived of bread and given only water to eat begged for bread after as little as two days.  8. Bread is often a "gateway" food item, leading the user to "harder" items such as butter, jelly, peanut butter, and even cold cuts.  9. Bread has been proven to absorb water. Since the human body is more than 90 percent water, it follows that eating bread could lead to your body being taken over by this absorptive food product, turning you into a soggy, gooey bread-pudding person.    10. Newborn babies can choke on bread.    11. Bread is baked at temperatures as high as 400 degrees Fahrenheit! That kind of heat can kill an adult in less than one minute.    12. Most American bread eaters are utterly unable to distinguish between significant scientific fact and meaningless statistical babbling.  Therefore:   In light of these frightening statistics, we propose the following bread restrictions:   1. No sale of bread to minors.  2. A nationwide "Just Say No To Toast" campaign, with complete celebrity TV spots and bumper stickers.  3. A 300 percent federal tax on all bread to pay for all the societal ills we might associate with bread.  4. No animal or human images, nor any primary colors (which may appeal to children) may be used to promote bread usage.  5. The establishment of "Bread-free" zones around schools.   — Author unknown. Found circulating around the interwebs.
&gt; Also, you should probably care.  Maybe I should, but I don't.  You still haven't given me a use case. Answering a specific question with generalities doesn't work.  The active record example of why you'd want to override static methods at all makes some plausible sense, but instance methods introspecting on the class they're declared in (breaking all future polymorphism) just seems to me to be unambiguously shitty object oriented design, in any language, in any paradigm.  Records might want to do something with their table, fine, use "get class" or something. Don't say "table row -&gt; fetch all", that's just stupid.  If you're going to say I'm wrong, give me a clear case, or retract.
Good deal, provided they're not paying him much more than they already were. I think he had a really positive affect on the likes of Crosby &amp; Malkin, which is certainly important if you're looking for players for the Penguins.
If she pleasures you while you eat it you will know for sure.
You are really gonna tell me that a vast majority of Mormons (or other religious followers) dont consider themselves better than the rest of the non-Mormons(religious)?
He stole my xbox. He copied all of my saves onto his and vice-versa in the hopes that I wouldn't notice what he had done.   The memory card was a mutual friend's which he used to transfer the saves from one to the other (the mutual friend didn't know what he had used it for).  Once I realized what he had done I deleted all of the saves on both boxes and the card and move my xbox back to where it belonged.  Was it unnecessary? yeah, probably.
hell yeah, tim geithner
No, that's Glory.
FFS stop worrying and just say it.
If I'm lying, may god strike me de,g;l/hk
For the first two points? &gt;The UK is providing just under $100m the US just over $75m...  The article itself mentions it.  As to the other points well the China/US/EU dealings are self evident, if you want specifics on 'western' fuck ups in Africa I can dig out a few choice ones when I get a chance (my favourites being related to either water or mining - something that western governments like to get access and link opening markets to trade and development aid...).
Yep, but being right DOES make my point valid. 
"The location in the economy" is away from where people work. You're pushing your personal preferences (having a state that can't tax all sales to residents) on other states. This isn't an issue of freedom v. unfreedom. Each choice necessarily is a restriction on someone's "freedom of action." It's Washington state's citizens "freedom" to choose to tax sales to its residents (and if you don't like it, move out of Washington) vs. Nevada's "freedom" to sell goods tax free to Washington's residents.  "Freedom" talk doesn't get you anywhere here. Personally, I think that Nevada, in the present scheme, is the coercive one, because it's forcing Washington to change it's laws. "State's Rights" are clearly NOT on your side in this argument.  Also, could someone please explain why I'm getting modded down? I mean, other than the fact that I'm expressing an unpopular opinion in the Business subreddit?
It is ironic though, that he doesn't support the only drop-in replacement for coal, the one thing that would stop us having to blow up most of these mountains.
lol. loser.  I suppose you are the kind that believe that Obama is Socialist too... hehe
Lua isn't an acronym.
* How It's Made * The Big Bang Theory  Add those two to your list, and you've pretty much got all the good TV programming currently out there. (Well, unless you like NUMB3RS or Bones)
If she smokes, she pokes.
How did you go from such a good argument.. &gt;How did you go from such a good idea...  &gt;&gt;1.Show that there is nothing wrong with secular positions. Be a proud atheist and be a good friend. If your religious friends see that there is nothing wrong with being an atheist and that they are in fact good people, then the position becomes further tolerated as generations pass.  to such a bad one?  &gt;to such a bad one?  &gt;&gt;Humor and ridicule. Make religion seem preposterous in subtle, clever ways. Make it seem like a shame for the populace at large to be religious. &gt;shaming people into believing what you want them to believe? sounds very "christian" to me  Actually I take it back. It was never a good argument. Calling a person's argument "christian" sounds very "stupid" to me.  Many religious people have minds and thinking patterns like children when it comes to their beliefs and will only respond to ridicule and showing their beliefs to be what they are: stupid. If they responded to rational argument then we would not be in this situation in the first place.  EDIT:formatting (I knew i would fuck it up on the first try....)
Sorry Sheldon. Good content. Bad design. No hard feelings?
Too bad you're still a douchebag. Good luck with that. 
Did you really expect something different when you saw the title of the youtube video; "Monkeys having sex on a car hood"?
&gt;My boyfriend is a saint and is paying the rent bills while I look for work and **help him with his side business.**  Sometimes the answer is right in front of you.  Seriously, use your time to build the business into something you can do together.  You can sell a business, but you can't sell a job.
Yeah, totally. Median Melbourne is now 450K vs 550K for Sydney. But still, for say 500K in Melbourne you can get something reasonable where as in Sydney that wouldn't get you far would it?  The top end of Sydney is about the best in the world though, a place for say, 1.5M with a  harbour view would be very hard to beat. 
It's really easy.  Muslims come from the middle east. They look different from white people. Structure of the skull and colour of the skin.
What?! NO.  WHERE in the bible does it say the Earth is flat and covered by a glass bowl?!!?   We studied Genesis in our literature class back in first year university. The professor read the first chapter to us, in Hebrew, and it is poetry. Read it for yourself, "So God made the expanse and separated the water under the expanse from the water above it. " What does the water above mean? I think the milky way kinda makes sense, from a poetical viewpoint, no?   Look, the majority of Christians do not believe Genesis to be a scientific account of how the universe was formed. The text doesn't even claim to be scientific. It's more like asking an artist how he painted or sculpted a masterpiece, and he replies that he poured his soul into it, that he painted the memory of his lost love...Do we then say that these people are nutjobs? No. It's poetry--an expression that He was pleased with the universe that he made very carefully. That's all. Read it for yourself, it's only one chapter. 
and your mom.
And the only emotion it knows is "butthurt"
I know! Isn't it wonderful?
Was it the auto-tune track?
Ummm....there were *bicycle* licenses? Damn!
why do they need the address and phone number? i thought it automatically showed up on their little 911 screens.
Is doom legacy going to be opensource like wolf was?  If so, you can just build it yourself and send it to your iPhone.
how many heard Morgan's voice in their head while reading that?
Oh my god what happened to her ? :(
&gt; I refuted Raldi  Of that, I have *no* doubt.
&gt;LMAO you **where** probably too dumb to figure out how to close it.  &gt;I never **user** adblock and I have 0 problems  I'm already counting two problems.
Probably true.  I wonder, however, if the Stig or some other pro racer might perform better than the computer.
It's a good game and I'd suggest giving it a try, but don't expect it to be anything like Chrono Trigger because it isn't.  Also don't expect to understand anything the hell that's going on in the plot until possibly your second play-through.
How do you ensure your naps are REM-sleep-filled?
Being on an iPhone, I immediately zoomed in on the text to see what this was about. I was halfway through when it faintly occurred to me that the little narrative was not remotely related to this post. 
I don't know of flatness is a very important factor. It might be, but I think it doesn't have to be a problem. I also think bike infrastructure isn't all that important. Berlin has many bikes and the parts of the city that I've seen were most definitely not made with bikes in mind.  It seems to me that the main issue is to change the laws to favor cyclists, inform drivers to be careful and to expect cyclists on their path, and, the most difficult part, somehow actually getting people to use bikes instead of considering it a lame hippie vehicle.  There's an interesting movement here in Sao Paulo where a few hundred cyclists ride through the city once a month to raise awareness (as the laws are already in place). Surely but very slowly, cycling is becoming a more acceptable way of travel. I hear the same things are happening in cities in the USA, with some recent successes in New York.
I answered this thread, not some other that you've just tried to introduce.
Your mama's talking to herself.
Is it a genus of plant in family Meliaceae?
Is the Microsoft Mafia using the term "anti-bullshit turfer" instead of "perception management" now?
Maybe because Israel is one of the top technology centers in the world? If you're using a computer using an Intel processor, you have an Israeli to thank.
Well, if you ever decide that I'm a personal friend, feel free to send me an invite. :-P
Seems like a classic case of someone too fat to wipe themselves properly. Sad stuff.
vml anyone?
&gt;In recent rounds of long conversations, most made it clear that they suffer a kind of survivor’s guilt: they can’t quite believe that for two frantic months last fall, caught in a Bermuda Triangle of a campaign, they worked their tails off to try to elect as vice president of the United States someone who, by mid-October, they believed for certain was nowhere near ready for the job, and might never be.  I'm not sure I understand what they mean by "survivor's guilt" in this context. Survivor's guilt is when you feel that you've done wrong by surviving a traumatic event that others didn't survive. I can see why they would feel guilty, but wouldn't that be ordinary, well-founded "we almost fucked the country" guilt?
you are an idiot. You only mention the numbers for strongly approve and strongly disapprove, while intentionally omitting the numbers of those who just approve and disapprove, not strongly. That is dishonest.
Science used to be the study of God's Creation, another form of worship.
I don't know if it's real or not, but there's certainly no shortage of entitled little shits that would act like that.  
I like Wednesdays off, breaks the week up nicely.
Or threaten to make a sex tape. 
My wife and I drove under a low-hanging roll cloud a few years ago. Hands down the most incredible weather event I've ever witnessed. It was perfectly smooth, like new snow on a mountain, and it stretched to the horizon in both directions. No camera, dang it!
&gt;A high percentage can't orgasm without them...   ...we all know there is no such thing as the female orgasm...
He wasn't changing the constitution, he proposed a non-binding referendum asking the people whether they wanted to form a constitutional assembly to write a new constitution. And the problem with congress and supreme court was the lack of due process and publicity.
Who is this? ;)
Yep, one of my favorite zombie flicks.  And I love me some Linnea Quigley.
This guy is loaded. I kind of wish my room looked like that.
Is this the most highly up-modded comment on reddit? It's the highest I've seen.
I tell my recruiters point blank. I do not wish to work or live in cities or states that have oppressive gun laws. Almost all of them openly admire my conviction and adjust the reqs sent to me accordingly.
Ok a bit of a preface here, my roommate was brown, and I come from a city with about 3 of them. I travelled to school (southern ontario) and wound up on a double room (ie/ two parallel beds with about 7ft between them) floor with probably some of the best people ever (nearly everyone on the floor still communicates, nearly)...   These are a few of the killers that I can remember.  2am - We're trying to sleep and and he keeps talking, and the subject of killing someone comes up and whether you'd feel guilty or not. He reponds with "No, not really, I've killed someone" wtf? He begins to tell me this story about how he was at a bar with his cousin and this dude tried to beat the crap out of his cousin so he went to town on him with beer bottles. I was mortified.  Long night of partying, he comes home, im sleeping and pukes on the floor. Does not clean it up all night. Puke seeps into walls.  Literally had curry every single day. Now im not a fan of that stuff but I don't really care if you do, but he had it every single day that his mom would bring him. Ever bring a girl back to a room that reeks like curry? Some how not a turn on.  Did i forget to mention how he cleaned up the puke? A few paper towels, no disinfectants.   He had eczema and forwhatever reason his skin flakes would blissfully migrate from one side of the room to the other into my zone.  I had to find out one night after him wanting to smoke pot that he is in fact a genuine schizophrenic screaming out slurries of swears and twitching.  Thats all i can type for now. There are more, oh god there are more.  EDIT: On the salvadorian guys birthday on our floor he took his mickey of tequila and slammed the whole fucking thing in 30 seconds and it all came back up later that night while he was sleeping.
These quotes used are just from some members of the crew that just want to get their names out there. There is probably no fact to them at all.
Bollocks.   Killing someone is only justifiable if you are about to be killed, or someone else is about to be killed.  It isn't justifiable after the fact and certainly isn't justifiable as a punishment.  Firearms would do nothing except escalate situations like this.
We deserve every bit of it until we stand up together to stop it... Remember everyone, someone most likely has a time line for the end of this bigger plan we are starting to witness of.   We have all the evidence of who these perpetrators of the NWO are, we know how to stop them. WE Need to start motivating!
Same here. When I sleep, my cat sits on my head. I think he's trying to smother me.
If around the country racing interests there is the television series Bull Run http://unitedwarez.com/divx-television-shows/52846-bullrun-101-divx.html
Oh great.... here we go again.
Yep, look up Canadian Maple Leaf coins. They come in sizes ranging from 1/20oz to 1 oz, in silver gold and (I think) platinum. The gold coins they make are one of the purest in the world - 99.99% gold content. That makes them attractive to jewelers, or so I've been told. The fact that the coin is marked and easily recognized as created by the Canadian Mint that means that when you sell the coin it doesn't need to be assayed again, unless the coin is visibly damaged (ie: shaved). That makes them a very attractive way to hold precious metals, despite the fact that they cost a bit more than bars.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Canadian_Gold_Maple_Leaf
Uneasy silences when I'm trying to sleep.  I guess you could sorta say that I'm afraid of the dark, except that if there's a fan on or music playing, or someone else sleeping in the room (even a pet), I'm OK.  I dunno, maybe it has to do with these weird out-of-body experiences I got a lot as a child while sleeping, or the fact that I used to hear a lot of hypnagogic sounds while I was drifting off to sleep, which weirded me out.  But if there's dead silence in my room, my ears get really alert and I feel the need to listen intently for any subtle noises in my environment.
I had known this girl for about a year and a half, she was transferring cities with her job and needed somewhere to stay for a couple months since her lease ran out. She said she would pay my rent and give me an extra $100.00 each month for groceries. I agree to let her stay, which i soon would regret. she ate all the food in the refrigerator, and only spent her money on jugs of wine and cigarettes, oh. . she did end up giving me $20.00 and then continues to ask to borrow $10.00 for gas money. The kicker- she left me with some of the food from her pantry that she didn't want to move . . . including a hot coco mix . . that infested my house with roaches. 
HOLY FUCKING SHIT!  I'M GOING TO WORK FOR 30 DAYS AND MAKE SO MUCH MOTHER FUCKING MONEY THAT I'LL FUCKING BUY YOUR CHEAP, BITCH ASS OUT!  I'LL SQUASH YOU LIKE THE FUCKING BITCH ASS WANGSTA YOU ARE!
What's this garbage you people are reciting?
I think they could work it in where every third or fourth event was PPV.   The article is right in that there are only two or three big names in WEC so people won't buy for every event unless they want to do Brown vs. Faber ever other month.  Have three or four smaller events where ranking are determined and fighters introduced then have a PPV.  They can even have promotion fights where an up and comer in a weight division that translates to UFC fights a gatekeeper in that weight class for a chance to move over.
You seem to be aﬄicted with a taste for terribly subtle puns.
=(
~~~~~~~~~~~~~THIS POSTER IS A SPAMMER~~~~~~~~~~~~
I've actually known some girls on b.net that were really good. Their boyfriends taught them.   Don't see any girls in the pro leagues though.
I'm not comparing it to anything.  I'm simply stating that hitting 868 home runs in ANY professional league ANYWHERE is pretty remarkable.  It's still a *professional* league, played by *professionals*, which means there is still a quite a bit of talent needed to accomplish something like that.   I'm pretty sure the two of us combined, and everyone in our families, haven't hit 868 professional home runs.  
A Brief History of the Universe, by Bill Bryson. Great book.
How does the B not being accepted by some lesbians have anything at all to do with Gay Pride? And what about Pride as an event is dismissive of bisexuals? I'm sure you make valid points, but they're not the ones the author was raising; this author is just plain confused.
American Mcgee's Alice... this is an absolute MUST.  Most of the music was composed by Chris Vrenna, the drummer of Nine Inch Nails.
Good, thought I was going mad. I hate when either plaintiffs or defendants in a case go into court thinking they have a slam dunk case. It almost always goes against that notion. Perhaps both jury and judges don't like that attitude?
I think 'on my ass' is more common, but it means nagging about something I guess.
Its like the remote panties, except your friend can't steal the remote to your gfs panties in the middle of class and start randomly setting it off getting her really pissed at you that throughout the entire day it would just randomly go off.
[Journey to Silius](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NjG2ZjPqzzE)   [Actraiser](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YLUlbnc11_w)  And of course, [Fallout 3](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=eYF5KI5RnsM&amp;feature=related)
He will be missed.... by him. 
Oh man you told people?   DOOMED!!!!
What's the song in the video? I like it.
Ooh! Can we start a bun thread?
My experience with it dates back to my virgin 17 year old self and my now-ex girlfriend. This was my first encounter with any sort of intimate contact. I was at a friend's BBQ party when I met her. Too keep it brief: we talked for a while, short make-out session, then went into her room, laid on the bed and listened to her iPod. She ended up passing out for the night shortly afterward using my arm as a pillow, leaving me pinned down next to her with a persistent erection. I don't know how long I laid there, but my balls soon began to suffer. It's not quite the same feeling as being kicked in the nuts, but definitely similar.
. . . Such as? 
Dude just looks tired to me. Oh, and tired of bullshit.
soon i will read the new constitution of HUnduras written by the soverign people of the new constitutional assembly. Not one made by oligarchs. loser
I am a redhead. So I can make money just being a redhead? Why was I never told this?
Her 'attack' was triggered by my smoking a cigarette on the back porch. She said the smoke poured into her bedroom causing her to have an attack... 2 hours later. She wasn't even home while I was smoking the damn thing. There are so many of these gems. Her anger trigger was of me being "whatev" to her psychotic outbursts. It was like if I didn't get seriously upset then she would get crazier.  I had felt at the time that she was faking the attack but I still felt sorry about it. Even after I had practically thrown up my organs. She hung up a doctor's note on her bedroom door that said she couldn't be around cigarette smoke. She even had her mother call me and tell me that I needed to pay for her ER visit.  So I'm not sure if she put the bleach in before I smoked or while I was in my bedroom for the few hours until I took her to the hospital.
I found out a couple of months ago that my wife was cheating on me. I kind of freaked out at first (we were separated for 3 years!!) but once I got past the shock (about 3 seconds) I was actually relieved. Now I had a reason to get out of an unhappy relationship and resume the life I had built when we were separated. That being said I am still kind of bitter that she chose to end it the way she did. We had previously split up because of an “online/phone affair” she had with some guy and she knew this would be a mean and hurtful thing to do a second time. Only this time it was with a real live person that she met through work. He lives out of state but there have been several trips either here or there.  I digress; this isn’t really about the history of our f’ed up relationship. I found out today (she hasn’t moved out yet), that the guy she is cheating with is black. This has made me upset and I cannot stop thinking about it. I do not consider myself a racist, of course, but these feelings have me questioning my belief. Living in a decent sized city in the Midwest I have lived and worked with African Americans for the last 20 years. I have learned that people are people, some are good and others are bad, race is irrelevant.   Do these feelings make me a racist? Is the fact that these feelings disturb me somehow redeeming? 
You're exactly the type of person I want to hear from in this posting.  I don't mind when people disagree with me, but why are you being confrontational? It debases your arguments.
I hate this game. It shortly becomes a war of attrition and pisses me off.
At least he won't be Bachman.  
I like the part where Al Gore destroys the Earth. 
&gt; I'm guessing you are one of Israel's paid counter bloggers  Come the fuck on. Seriously.
This just further supports my theory that we are breeding a generation of pussies. That little bitch had a knife and he still got the shit beat out of him by a man that was almost four times older than him.   On a side note; i love how the article further shames that degenerate by posting his facebook pictures.
I don't know why, but I trust him.
yes
Microsoft trolls are on Reddit too.  A Microsoft Troll Zoo -  "It's a game M$ has been playing against their competitors for a long time and the same people infest newsgoups. M$'s sociopathic nature has been documented in their own words in court. They have turned their methods against the entire free software community, and relentlessly harass anyone who says or thinks anything negative about M$."  http://slashdot.org/~twitter/journal/204737
I've seen quite a few of them, but will check the rest out. Thanks! =)
...BBC?! Seriously? My friend you've just gone from bad to worse.
Ridiculous?
WOO-HOO...finally!
I have...soooo...totallly experienced that. Every time i'm...pimping the..ladies. Yeah it's so bad..and painful..when they start turning blue..i'm all like..nuh uh honey. 
That's Sapele.
Es una página que tiene menos de 10 horas de existir, por que la acabo de registrar!  Yo invito a la gente a participar.  Claro que estaría dispuesto a trabajar con ellos, aunque me gustaría expandir en lo que han hecho. Quisiera trabajar un poco en la página antes de hablar sobre "unirse" a otros...  Ahorita, tal vez sea más útil una donación de tiempo que de dinero. Específicamente, tiempo para diseñar la página. ¿Quién le entra?
Why Won't Jesus' Dad Free The World?
Would be an interesting starting point for a videogame. You could take any random section and you would get real natural terrain that nobody recognises.
Wait, wait.... this isn't... REAL?!
I haven't tried it but I would think so.  
I don't think Atheism needs money any more than religion does. Neither of them put that money toward anything but ad space, which is something neither of them need. Sorry.
And what if they both propose the same field position? Perhaps they can also bid how many series of downs or plays they can score in as well.
Best-case failure scenario, TPB sucks for a while without ever going down entirely, prompting people to migrate to some new post-BT or enhanced BT format with better anonymity, proper decentralization, and maybe plausible deniability. 
It's not a problem on your end, there is audio only on the left channel. Usually this happens when someone captures from a source with mono audio and doesn't bother to correct it.
people will only switch when the pain of dealing with windows outweighs fear of trying something new.  Get out of your mental comfort zone!  
I like the part where he immediately lays down for a nap after.
Have you ever met people who are psychologists / psychiatrists? The phrase "takes one to know one" takes on a whole new meaning when you encounter the manipulative insanity that typifies mental health doctors.
Here a little girl was asked what she would do if a monster came into her room, we will just let you “ask” her for yourself…
Isn't it a retired Russian hockey player named Pavel who used to play for the Vancouver Canucks?
It would be nice if Microsoft were to offer pre-ordering in South East Asia. AFAIK, they don't plan to do this. I think this is racist.
Not religious Korean girls.
Jethro Tull - Crest of a Knave ?
I didn't say it was an original definition, but I did come up with it on my own.  Thanks for pointing out that someone else thought of it too, I feel less alone now. :-)
Everybody that owns a gun anyways.  So you could only buy one a month if you don't have a gun, but once you get one you could buy more?
Oh who cares, this is starting to sound like a homeowner's association meeting...
This is a less relevant issue than it was 20 years ago, though unfortunately still relevant. Sadly, the first thing a lot of gay subcultures will do is exactly what straight culture did to them: discriminate against people based upon the genitals they have vs the genitals of the person they're attracted to. 
So are you paid to be here?
most of the soldiers will probably shoot the religious pricks.
Soooo... you're saying that I should personally rip the ads out of my newspaper? That I should turn the TV off for 30 seconds every time a commercial comes on?  No thanks. So very not worth the effort. And so completely against the idea of what "new media" and "user selected content" was supposed to be.  Nope, hawking has it right. If this is how they're going to play, I need to throw this site right in the shit-can. Next to TV, Radio and all other forms of media that decided ad revenue was more important than quality content.  There will be other sites. I'm not worried.
guns are for MEN.
interesting, couldnt leave comments on the blog.  The earliest I know of is AXE by SEA (makers of ARC).. dates to 1987..  packers are fun stuff (I wrote one) but more fun were unpackers like unp and anithackers like rose hackstop,protect, etc.  then there was the virus (cruncher) that compressed executables as it infected...
you won't have to fight it on your own.. we'll help out!
[The A Song of Ice and Fire series](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/A_Song_of_Ice_and_Fire)
Who writes these headlines anyway? "Female" is so... clinical. Not to mention redundant.  I think we can safely assume that brunette is always going to be female. 
yes.  hate it.  does that give them another page hit every time you try to go back or what?  any idea what the term for that is, i.e. how would I refer to that when talking to someone knowledgeable?  as much as I usually dislike "self" reddit posts, I've been very tempted to submit one about this topic. 
And Satan is a product of God!
You say that now, just you wait until the zombies gets a hold of this. 
Yep, that too.  And you still had no luck finishing the job, huh?
What kind of "hints" did you give her? Is there any touching? Have you ever kissed?  You can't just spit out, "I love you", after not seeing each other for a while. Spend a fun day together (hopefully involving drinks) and at the end of the day just tell her that you want to kiss her. After the kiss, you might be able to proceed with the "I love you".
&gt;We know Adam &amp; Eve were black, and so was the biblical people. Right, white people **evolved** from adam and eve.
Good straight-up deal. Great player, wealth of experience, short-term deal. There were small rumours about him coming up here to Montreal, but this makes a whole lot more sense.
&gt; Those that can't remember the past....  Forget to control the future?
Sorry, I meant The Fall.
Really? Were does he make the statement? I don't see him at a "torturing" place laughing at the chicken. No. I see him at the protester line laughing at the protesters, while doing the thing that would irate them most!
Nope.  It's Amoora.
I'm the opposite. White text on a black background gives me a headache and within five minutes my vision is blurry. 
Umm, Bill... You suck on the Logs. That's how it works.
Also the reaction from the anchors is in no way priceless.
Check out a site run by his son - VERY interesting: http://medfraud.info/
[This here nowdoc is here, now](http://us2.php.net/manual/en/language.types.string.php#language.types.string.syntax.nowdoc)
Mainly because we're already doing that, and I was curious if it would work with more specific things.
Don't worry Ghost Rider will keep you safe.
I did not know that.
i had taco bell for lunch. i think i threw up in my mouth a little (but i still love the onion).
awesome post!! i like Goddess Etain from Shaiya ....
Make a tasty Carolina red bbq sauce, and add the full plus one half called for brown sugar, substituting half the vinegar whiskey. Then simmer to thicken into more of a glaze then the traditional soppin sauce for pulled pork.  Glaze it onto anything as a bbq sauce, or use as is. Any recipe will work, choose you favorite. The key is extra brown sugar, half whiskey-half vinegar instead of full vinegar, and simmer it to thicken instead of using as a traditional Carolina sauce.  This is what goes on regular grilled chicken here more often than not. It kicks that store bought Jack Daniels sauce type stuff in the balls and laughs, "Verily, you suck, I do not."
Ok, she was hot the first time or 2, but for fuck's sake, stop posting this picure!
Herpes can be spread when the person is asymptotic. And if a condom ever breaks... 
At least you're consistent at spelling roommate wrong.
Hmm would you guys be able to add comic sans as optional font in which to read the text?
That's a Bure.
Cali is not *that* bad, you can still get NFA stuff if you want (from what I understand). Most decent guns are on the OK list, you just can't get a proper black gun. I could live with that if I were a native or sentimental...  Look at it this way, you aren't dumping tons of money on rail accessories or crates of ammo (neither am I, for that matter, but I could be if I wanted to..).  No matter what, keep shooting.
I can't attribute the balloon fear to any particular event. I *do* remember, though, the first time I was afraid of balloons. I was definitely younger than 7, and I was helping decorate for someone's birthday party. I was assigned to blow up balloons, and it occurred to me that the balloon might pop while I was blowing it up. From that point, I couldn't risk blowing it up too big. Then it was the intense feeling of dread whenever *anyone* did something that might make the balloon pop.  I'd compare the feeling to the moment the suspense music comes on in a *really* effective horror movie. You know something bad is going to happen, and you often know exactly what it is, but you don't know exactly when, so you have to be ready.
&gt; So, either you won't even get that small sliver anymore, or people who pay most likely won't be subjected to all the ads.  There are plenty of ads on cable TV, in my print newspaper, and in magazines and I pay for all of those as well.  I envision web sites of traditional media companies will eventually adopt this model as well and require you to not only pay to actually access the site, but view banner advertisements as well.  It'll be up to the independents content providers to offer an alternative to this crap.
This is going to make truther heads explode
How big is the data? Somebody upload a torrent and give these guys a break.
&gt; This begs the question   This **raises** the question.
Right between Iraq and Afghanistan.
They work, don't they? Instead of just some random commercial that you quickly forget about, **you remember** those Geico commercials with the cavemen. The caveman isn't the important part, and neither is making it funny. It's all about making you remember the company. And it does it well. Some commercials, they're funny, but a few days later, while you may remember the commercial itself, you have no clue what the hell it was advertising for. Sure, the caveman commercials aren't funny, but you certainly remember them. And look! Geico is getting free advertising *right now* because of those commercials.
So what's the verdict on the Daily Mail, or any media outlet for that matter, being able to use Facebook pictures?
...control the future.  *Nice*, George Orwell reference.
Was that standardized test the [TUCE](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Test_of_Understanding_in_College_Economics)? I found that by Googling, so I have no idea if it is the right one, and I'm just going to assume that you took the TUCE. Was it your impression that the test was difficult? Did it cover the material in-depth? The Wikipedia page says that it only consists of 30 four-option multiple-choice questions, and I have hard time believing that a 30-question test can thoroughly cover a 4-year degree program. (Or is economics really as meaningless as some people say it is? ;] )  P.S. Your second point is probably true but not really relevant to the topic of standardized testing; it would have been better in a separate comment.
I notice this happens all the time, but I decided to actually say something this time. What the heck is going on in Iran? There's no way the demonstrations just abruptly finished. Was it all just the flavor of the week? It seems that now Reddit seems to have shifted back to Israel. I was curious if anybody had any updates or helpful links they were willing to share. Thanks in advance.
I'm so trying that breath technique.
ILLUSIONS MICHEAL, ILLUSIONS!
So is it the high-definition DVD format that beat out HD-DVD?
I would very much like to see other samples of your hobby. Perhaps one with a less frequently used piece of music. Surprise me!
I think I just found Jesus! Oh wait, just an epileptic seizure.  Thank goodness, still an Atheist. I was worried for a second.
I'd flick 2, keep 1.  Put it on the other side of the equation for a moment - a spinning blade coming for your face/torso...  A fast moving piece of metal isn't pleasant either way and rather distracting.  That said I was learning from a circus guy so it was hardly self defense. Giving weapons to your opponent (if they aren't already holding better than a knife) seems like a rather bad idea. :)
Traditional copyright isn't right for everyone. Whether it be the inherent flaws it's carried since inception or the way it's been twisted over the years, there are certainly reasons not to copyright your work. Luckily there's an alternative - Creative Commons. The "copyleft" movement known as creative commons (or CC) will allow you to specify exactly what people can and can not do with your work. Best of all, properly applying creative commons is quick and almost impossible to mess up.
"Democracy? I thought we were a Hypocrisy." - GOP
And it costs around $400 IIRC. 
Start with the movies, when you're done with the movies there are a ton of books (or books on tape). If you want the straight stuff, there are TONS and TONS of star wars encyclopedias, illustrated ship schematics, books with bio's on most major characters. If that doesn't satiate your appetite then there is always star wars wikipedia/forums/support groups etc.
I'm down with spanking people.... wait, what?
Yes it is. But the point of this article is that it isn't nearly as much as fund managers made. And Michael Jackson produced works of far greater value than the fund managers. The article also advances that this inequality is the reason the economy is fucked.
This is an example why nobody should flush an airplane toilet while sitting down on it. The result would be the world's longest pink sock.
fff
I thought that was a popular auction website.
 I think the Shaq move is one of desperation and might actually hurt the Cavs and help the other teams in the east.
What country ARE you in, if you don't mind me asking?
And that is Adult Swim in a nutshell.
Thanks for the advice! I will probabaly wait a bit to see if I can luck out on a sale like you suggested. Did you end up buying a notebook cooler or are they unnecessary? 
Coincidentally, when feeding it dreams (I like to write mine down) in which I am male (which are most common for me), it interprets the writer as male, and the ones in which my gender is not otherwise specified or female, as female. Usually "weak" in either case.
&gt; I'm sure there are other ways.  I have absolutely no idea what you mean. =)
&gt;http://freegaza.org/en/home/hope-fleet-news/976-israel-attacks-justice-boat-kidnaps-human-rights-workers-confiscates-medicine-toys-and-olive-trees  Excellent source, completely **impartial.** I find this comment to be humorous at best. I'd advise you to go to freegaza and attempt to find a human being that has any background in journalism.
Well said.
1. **there is no other planet** to experiment on 2. your definition of science is simplistic and flawed - science is a "*systematic knowledge-base or prescriptive practice that is capable of resulting in a prediction or predictable type of outcome.*" 3. "**predictable type of outcome**" 4. we have decades, centuries, thousands of years of climate data to make predictable types of outcome. The data confirms the science. Not the models.  Regardless, this is an irrelevant conversation - the world is listening to the *climate scientists* and they're all saying the same thing.
Gravel?  My ancestors only had dust...and they were lucky to have it!
I actually liked this one-  &gt; Another clown in the Senate, what’s new...
I used to study shotokan karate as a kid.   Because of Lyoto Machida, I've actually started practicing kata again.  It's kind of like riding a bike; you never really forget.  
That is not the point of the article, though!
She can't be that stupid?Political Suicide is usually reserved for the GOP recently.
I think that beats my all time speed sex record
&gt;Here come the down votes.  Actually, I think anything that makes redditors feel better about themselves would get upvoted. ;)
I'm at peace with my small penis, and she did come back so it can't be too bad :)
I don't rattle easily (and offer [this autobiographical list for evidence](http://www.jmooneyham.com/shadowfast-supercar-driver-logs.html) (and yes: I'm very old by redditor standards)). Indeed, my biggest problem was getting myself to worry ENOUGH about things like physics classes to put sufficient effort into it. Thus, all my attempts to bypass the hardest work with tricks of various sorts.   My second biggest problem was I was badly distracted from learning the algebraic and fractional manipulations I'd need for college level work by the violence and certain other matters at my high school, and so wasn't well prepped at all for later engineering college. For instance, I had zero physics or chemistry classes in high school.   Take my word for it: it is EXTREMELY difficult to learn advanced college math and physics formula work while simultaneously trying to learn the high school math you missed before.   So no: although part of hypnosis IS relaxation techniques, I wasn't usually nearly as worried by the tests as my class mates. But I WAS putting a lot of effort into trying to kick my own butt into gear.
Ok, I'll bite. What's the allure? I played the WoW demo for a few hours and was not impressed.  I've played various other MMOs, Eve Online being one of them. I also played a Korean designed game called Knight Online, which was quite fun. It was f2p though.  Edit: Ok, i know playing the trial shouldn't really count, but I only had the desire to play for a couple hours when I had the option to play 10 days. I started Eve Online in the same way - on a 14 day trial, but decided to start paying after that.  For me the point of mmos is good pvp, and my impression from WoW was that the pvp yields no real rewards. You can't win items, or lose items... No risk involved at all.
Your bullet points are all correct, but they don't make the US the country who defeated Hitler. The US were the country which defeated Japan (along with China and others, but the US role was crucial). But had Leningrad (St. Petersburg), Stalingrad (Volgograd) and Moscow fallen, the Nazis could have destroyed the Soviet Union and dominated all of its territory, and exploited its natural and human resources. This would have left Germany in *much* better shape to come-what-may continue to dominate western Europe as well and militarily pursue much harder their interests in other parts of Asia and Africa.  While I entirely agree that the US was "pretty important", the Soviets defeating Hitler was even more important.   &gt; This isn't jingoism or propaganda. It is a fact.  Thanks for pointing that out.  &gt; The fact that their factories and supply lines weren't being destroyed meant they could out produce everyone else in the world at the time.   Yes.  &gt; Without the supplies and manpower from the US, the Brits most likely would have capitulated and next the Russians.  The Brits, with their famous stiff upper lips, probably wouldn't have capitulated or --Hitler's preferred option-- switched allegiance to, or otherwise arranged themselves with the Axis unless having suffered extremely heavy losses. The Battle of Britain took place in summer/autumn 1940, and was won by the UK. Hitler invaded the Soviet Union on 22 June 1941. The US formally entered WWII in response to Hitler declaring war on the US on 11 December 1941. Before that, Germany's interest in defeating Britain had been reduced, as Germany considered the war in the West as essentially won. The Soviets would not have capitulated following a hypothetical British capitulation, which, after them winning the Battle of Britain, would have taken significantly more time and effort to secure. The Soviets would definitely not have capitulated after winning the battle of Stalingrad (17 July 1942 - 2 February 1943). Had the US stayed out of the war and also not supported Allied European powers before entering the war themselves, the Soviets would have continued to push westward, and eventually reached Berlin all the same. D-Day didn't take place until 6 June 1944. By that time Hitler had already very clearly lost in the East. Sure, the Nazis might well still have staged a late invasion of Britain after Stalingrad, but it would only have delayed the inevitable. That said, the US staying out of WWII would have dramatically increased the Soviet body count, because it would have made the Soviet campaign longer both in time and distance and Nazi opposition much more concerted. But after Stalingrad Europe could at most have turned all red. It would not have stayed brown, even without the US.  There were many points in WWII when things were a lot closer than people like to think today, and the outcome not at all a foregone conclusion. After Stalingrad, the Soviets (NB: Soviets != Russians) had the same advantage the US had: a huge *hnterland*. And while the Soviets in the battle of Stalingrad were indeed comparatively ill equipped and trained, their military, and technology, and production numbers got better and better afterwards. But ok, maybe saying that the US would have lost without the Soviets is the wrong order. It's probably more accurate to say that the Nazis being tied up and losing in the East made D-Day possible. 
I thought it was a tasty Canadian campfire treat with graham crackers, chocolate, and marshmallows?
Everybody poops
[See also:](http://www.theonion.com/content/node/33930)  Granted, slightly less real impact.
That's an eBay.
I've lived in Seattle where it constantly drizzles and currently live in Phoenix where it was 102 degrees outside yesterday, at 8 o' clock.  Do I like it when it rains? What type of rain are we talking about here? Thunderstorms? Awesome as shit. In the desert, monsoons are awesome displays of mother nature.  In Seattle, the general wetness of everything was annoying. It would rain just hard enough to where it would be a hassle to be outside. Harder to have a pet, especially a dog.  I'd still take Seattle over Phoenix though.  Edit: Phoenix is hot as shit.
I always perform oral sex on my food. I even swallow.
they will do whatever they want. court's "decision" is just to please the public.
Myth Busted! http://dsc.discovery.com/videos/mythbusters-airline-toilet-test.html
That is not a review. It just gives the specs and nothing else.
Well said.
You're Weird.
[citation needed]
Caucus is 60 with specter, franken, and the 2 independents.
WTF. Leela has ONE EYE okay, not a fucking eye patch! &gt;:(
This will probably get lost in this post, but I'll say it anyways.  It sort of doesn't seem like your sister is into the whole thing as much as you.  It might just be because she's not here to express her feelings, but especially with the kids thing it seems like she isn't as serious as you are.  Have you ever considered that?  I mean, you're the older brother, siblings tend to admire the older ones.  Maybe she feels a little bit pressured into it?  Or maybe it's just a phase or a fling for her.  You're obviously crazy about her (I mean you let her piss on you ...), but solely from your posts it doesn't seem 100% reciprocated.
Regarding the part about eating bacon at c, I disagree. True, the delicious bacon in your mouth possesses infinite mass, but then again so do your taste buds. Additionally, since the quantity of bacon pleasure is limited by the number of bacon molecules compared to the surface area of your taste buds, the mass of the bacon molecules is irrelevant. As long as both you and the bacon were traveling at the same velocity, the Newtonian approximations for the quantity of bacon pleasure and BCN hold up quite well.   Which is to say, "how much better is the additional mouthful" or ΔBCN/ΔB is governed by the mass of pure bacon relative the mass of the rest of the system, as you described in the first 2 paragraphs.   EDIT: to be super awesome, the BCN differential equation can also use Δ≈ =  Ψ(m,B)  notation.
Doesn't Ubuntu have a GUI installer for some software that is a subset of the repository? I remember using it a few years ago and it organized so-called best selections in each category, so if I selected to install a media player it'd have MPlayer rather than 10 different options. I thought it was labeled "Install Software" or something like that.  I can't find it now. It might have been removed from Ubuntu.
joe son do is HIGHLY susceptible to groin strikes, [iirc](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=z4iZ-NEz-mg) edit: link to video
Fanboy says what?
Thanks
They know because New York State has told them that they're not getting any tax revenue, and yet, they continue to do the same business practices. You and I know, because we're not idiots, that all of this is handled though a wink and a nod. Judges are, by and large, not idiots as well.   Conspiracy law does not require a formal agreement.
I went to Texas this winter and it was great. I ate so much steak I thought I was going to die, and die happy.
Ideally? Everywhere, all at once, without staying anywhere long. We've gone from Napster to Gnutella to Bittorrent, and at each step we get more and more decentralized. Maybe the right answer is to take another look at darknets like Waste and ask if inflexible, prepacked indices of content are the right way to wrangle albums and TV shows.
Trumped up charges like this tend to remind me of [Constable Savage](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yxMZZK0ol-E)
Is it what there'll be if Luke doesn't have those units in the South Ridge repaired by midday?
Barton Fink is one of my favorites. I have it and probably will be watching it! =)
It also really depends on the STD. If it's HPV she could have gotten it with the first person she ever slept with and been asymptotic this entire time. I BELIEVE this could also be true with herpes but not positive. 
Looks like a big fish with a gaping mouth. NOM NOM
[Of course.](http://reddit.com/r/conspiracy)
That's been my impression as well. Hazards doesn't open up right away but after a few spins, when it does, it's got legs. 
So it's Maury-O? I remember the Italian voice from the old ads, but I thought it was just the accent. Thanks for the education, you schooled me good.
Yes, but if you frequent /v/ most guys there will sum up a game with verbs with an '-an' suffix. EG. STALKER.... STALKAN, SNEAKAN, SHOOTAN   
*Damn* Leprechauns
[Kegel Exercises](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kegel_exercises)
The very thought of dancing infront of a crowd with all their attention on me like that makes me feel sick.  The bird bit was pretty good!
Well, considering InnerSpace existed before WoW or Glider existed it's pretty easy to imagine that the Glider community in WoW wouldn't know about it. In fact, people DID talk about InnerSpace on the Glider forums but they all wrote it off as useless because you needed to be able to program to make it work. Anything that was released openly was full of bugs and problems that you had to fix on your own. This is how "unworthy" people were kept out. First it was never advertised and second it took more skill than turning it on to use it. Even installing InnerSpace/ISXWoW/ISXWarden was too much for most people let alone using the programs for it.  No, it's not super secret. The person who runs it just doesn't do any advertising at all. You find out about it through word of mouth or searching. People talked openly about what they were doing in WoW, it wasn't a big secret at all. Glider ran ads on WoW sites, etc so it got the most exposure and it was also painfully obvious when someone was using it in game.  Like I said, BGBot was public software and you're missing the fact that really BGBot only joined the battleground and handled pathing and targetting for you. There was routines you needed to load for the class you were playing. This is what actually handled combat. The better your routine, the better your bot. It came with some very basic ones that did basically nothing, yes.  There's no way I can prove it, I don't come anywhere near any MMOs now. Here, check this script out too though: http://www.isxwow.net/forums/viewtopic.php?f=23&amp;t=262  PartyBot allowed you to group bots together and they would communicate with each other through an InnerSpace network link. This worked fine for grinding as a group, etc but again was only the public version.  Eventually this was taken even farther and people started doing Arenas with all bots and winning nearly every time. That's where things were when I stopped botting.  Anyway... believe it or not, I don't care anymore.
SimCity 3000.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=h1aWdI5I9xY&amp;feature=related  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xSJb1FlXMPQ&amp;feature=related  It was cool because the entire soundtrack was linked together with a simple 5-note theme.
Just one love of his life?! His girlfriend should have 2 girlfriends. Now that will be luck!!!
That is not the point of the article!
This is a little hard to swallow with the Sarah Palin ad right next to it. Of the two major parties, authoritarian goons don't usually flock to the one labeled "socialist". ********  Edit:  fuck you , don't you bury this without giving me a reason why.  Tell me what part of this is factually incorrect, you dumb fucking herd animals.  Sarah Palin is an authoritarian.  John McCain is an authoritarian.  Newt, Mitt, Bush, Cheney, all of em. The republican national convention sounded like Germany, 1936.  I watched that and felt like I had been punched in the stomach.  Canada?  not so much.  Sweden, Norway, Switzerland... hardly.  http://www.politicalcompass.org/analysis2  
Wait, then what is that restaurant chain that serves delicious burritos?
Thanks!  I appreciate it (and agree with you on Blogger...I had to give up on it years ago, I just couldn't take it anymore).
All this has happened before, and all this will happen again.
Tallest Man is so damn good. I'm hooked on all of the bands featured on that site.
They can't really say "By God" since they would be using his name in vain...
*"claims in support of the bond’s authenticity were made 20 / 6  on the Turner Radio Network (TRN), an independent radio station broadcast via Internet. "*  Hal Turner is a white supremacist wack job  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hal_Turner 
Yeah I understand putting a password on the phone, one of my friends does, but every time he opens it he has to put the code in. Fuck that, no one is taking my phone from me
They're not being paid, read the article.
shocking
Not true, if I say to you, "I don't know anything about sex and am a virgin" you would most certainly believe me, cuz people on the Internet don't lie about that shit.  Unless you're Kobe Bryant, in which case you might lie.  But I'm not Kobe Bryant.... or am i?
I'm pretty sure we're still the United States. LOL
Then a few redditors would DEFINITELY, FINALLY, have been laid. 
I've wondered if there was something they could do while waiting for an actual repeal of the law.  I don't think this is it.  What Gates needs to do is just let his flag officers know that enforcement, while its repeal is being worked, would not be in the best interest of the military services.  Nothing official.  Just expressing his feelings.  Most would definitely follow.  
epic?  really?  
Shoot those scum, israel!
Wait until you hear about the disconnection fee.
I've done this on many occasions. I think it's a gift because not a lot of guys can do this.
*wonders when slack-jawed politicians will get back to running country into the ground*
That's Dia de Los Muertos.
No, I did not kiss her. When it comes to these "hints", think more like writing poems for her, but actually I guess even more subtle :-(
How so?
Wow....v2.0 is out already!
That's Chipotle.
The people need to take the power back!
What did you end up paying for it? 
When I was 19 I wanted to have a fun long weekend with the girlfriend. I found a urologist and told him I had a limp dick and it made me and my girlfriend sad. He gave me a free sample pack of viagra to use.  The weekend was fun but the Viagra gave me a headache, went back a couple weeks later and he gave me a free pack of Cialis and man is that stuff awesome.
The best books a photographer can read are the manuals for their cameras, a brief description of the Zone system, etiquette of social events, and the Hitch Hikers Guide to the Galaxy. 
I hope there is a hell for sure so this fucktwat can burn in it
Ergonis Software today released Typinator 3.5, the fastest and most robust version of its highly acclaimed text expansion tool for auto-typing text and auto-correcting typos. Typinator has always shined for its speed and robustness as well as compatibility with arbitrary applications. The new version of Typinator introduces a new technology that makes the expansion and insertion of text even faster than before, reinforcing Typinator 3.5 the fastest and most compatible text expander ever.
Smart move
MANANA!
Definitely don't just blurt it out. Organize a hangout day ( essentially a friend-date) and just have a good time. If at the end, it went well, perhaps then tell her. 
I want my 50 seconds back!
I use the crutch mostly to give me a starting point when rolling the joint, and it gives my joints a more uniform cylindrical shape.
I THOUGHT THAT I HEARD YOU LAUGHING
Heaven is actually up.
Your headline has inspired me. I propose Thursday be permanently renamed Thrustday.
aaargh, it's some sort of freaky cross-pollination of content from my two favorite websites.
I wonder how many upmods I would've received in 1999 for: "After being a fucking waste of time and money, Gore finally concedes and gets out of the way of elected President George W. Bush."
 One of the only ways to get out of middle eastern bullshit is to become energy independent. When 2/3 of the worlds proven oil reserves are in the middle east the US is going to do what it needs to do in order to keep stability in the region. Cause stability in that region directly contributes to global economic security. Gold, oil, and drugs.
De Beers is owned a conglomerate made up of Anglo American PLC based out of London, the Oppenheimer family (South Africans with Germanic lineage), and Botswana.  Additionally, China is the top consumer of diamonds in the world.  I will give you that the slogan "Diamonds are Forever" came from America.  I'd like to see a citation for the tradition of diamond rings starting in the US.  That said, De Beers was a horrible monopoly that was great at perpetuation conflict and creating an artificial ceiling for the cost of diamonds.
This.
Yes, but don't worry. Everyone is racist on a subconscious level.
and raping kittens.
May I recommend   * ActionComplete - Getting things done to do list manager with tags , configurable alarms, projects, etc.  Very handy.. * Twitdroid - The best twitter client for Android. * Lastfm - Internet radio that learns the kind of music you like much better than pandora IMHO * Share Your Board - Awesome app that will make all your iphone friends jealous.  Take a picture of a whiteboard and it will color correct, edge detect, and trim the board so it turns into a perfectly readable gif reproduction of the white board.  Great app.
Maybe http://www.imeem.com/ ?
Maybe its one of those fake hair / wig things?
That just raises more questions....what's a white hole?   And more knowledge is never a sad thing; even, and I would argue, especially knowledge that is not accepted by general consensus. It makes you informative at times like these. Thank you, sir.
my grandpa is a regional boxing champion. In 90's when soviet union collapsed it was "cool" for teenagers to take leather coats off people, often by force, and trade them for vodka/drugs/etc on the street markets. Once my gramps (was 60 at the time) was walking home at night and two 20-ish dudes told him "take off your shoes and coat or we'll fuck you up"... One had a broken jaw and a collapsed lung and the 2nd had 3 broken ribs on one side and a fractured eye socket. Cops commended my gramps and let him go after writing a short report. This was downtown so a number of people saw this and confirmed he was a "victim". He had to go to court for a statement and one of the dudes literally quivered when he saw him. Later on there was an article in the newspaper. I felt so proud and all my buddies started fearing him. This story brought this memory. My gramps still works part time as PT teacher.
&gt; Plants are not magical, it's just science. Just because it looks like marijuana doesn't mean it contains the same chemical constituents. So again, there is no loophole you could find, no hopeful idea you could have, or any other process to make Hemp into anything more than an industrial plant. Edit: Just another example that may help... Japanese Oak Trees have very similar leaves to marijuana... but they won't get you high either, because (like hemp) they don't contain the right chemicals.  I asked some pretty reasonable questions, what the hell is up your ass?
the bird is up side down...
Yes, it's faster. Now make it don't use a year to start (compared to Chrome, which magically just pops up – nice when clicking some link that triggers your default browser).
You've let me know what makes you tick, thanks!
Is that a shot at Korean people?
No, only if the number of messages increased with each iteration, say by forwarding twice to the other account.
No, I'm liberal actually. 
&gt;KFC and Slider's whatever the hell they are  That's just about the most un-American thing I've heard anyone say
By "middle of nowhere" do you mean literally, no people around?   Or do you really mean, just not as urbane as you are used to? Because I'll tell you what, I would love to make a living wage, "in the middle of nowhere".   People piss me off on a daily basis and the fewer of 'em around, the better it is for me.
I agree with you on everything but the power outages. The loss of something that I use every day without even thinking about it is a bit scary.
So the fuck what! Affairs create distracting energies that attract masses of small-minded, viscerally-centered morons.  Let the lovers **themselves** work out the flaw and I would find it most satisfying if the fucking feminist horde would put a goddamn shoe in the collective piehole.
I included that link already. But I understand how you could miss it, dont know why reddit cant emphasise inlined links better.
As a Bearded-American, I fully support my British brothers in their hard struggle against their bald-faced oppressors. 
How's your homework doing?
If there's a hurricane and your house fills with water because your roof blows off, it's deemed "a flood" and won't be covered (unless you have flood insurance) no matter how many thousands of feet above sea level you are.  kind of misleading, but then again, that's insurance companies...
I do believe I contacted the webhost and he was shut down?  He may have found a new host, or simply created a new account.  I can't be certain - I have emailed lots of abuse departments recently :S
I believe you have your speakers backwards.
These kind of white color criminals make up a small portion of the non violent people in prison - they are clearly not what this is about. 
I'd call a guy that slept with 20 women in a year a slut. But I take sex a bit seriously so that's just my personal opinion. 
Well, since you only see her a couple times a month, it might not be TOO awkward if it falls through. Heh, sorry that's the best I can say. I guess the biggest mistake you could make is come on too too strong, as in you seem really desperate about it. And as they say, "it's better to regret something you've done then something you haven't."
They had to leave his eyes and lips flesh colored? What, they ran out of makeup? 
Upvoted for Koyaanisqatsi and Eraserhead, but in my opinion THX1138 is overrated. Maybe it just seems like that to me because everyone that has seen it that I've talked to says how awesome it is.   PS - The baby in Eraserhead gave me nightmares. 
&gt; which basically invalidates your complaint, yeah?  Nope. It's still "CONSUME / OBEY / NO INDEPENDENT THOUGHT" crap, which never would have made it to the front page on the strength of user votes. It's blatant consumerism of the stupidest kind, and Reddit is throwing it right in my face.
Seriously this is epically old.  Fuckin david Letterman beat you to the story by a year and a half, and he doesn't even know what the internet is.  www.youtube.com/watch?v=caYZpzC0Vw0 
In Korea, chicks don't *play* Starcraft, they [master it!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QtyEG52_FqA)  &gt; Estimated course length: 6-8 hours.   If this guy can make a Bonjwa out of a noob in 8 hours he's going to be rich.
Use the sample; the username/password is the admins', not yours.
Man, I feel like I'm saying this a lot lately about various things on reddit- for the forward-thinking, intelligent community reddit is supposed to be, I'm often surprised by the backwards attitude on certain things here. Seriously, is everyone afraid of sex?
The environmental extremists at the EPA were probably hoping the report they hid which pointed to natural causes of global warming would just go away permanently after the cap and trade tax vote, but people found out about it and now Senator James Inhofe (R-OK) and Senator John Thune (R-SD) are calling for an investigation into the incident.
:) may be...
Why? It's all Jon &amp; Kate reruns these days...
Why do you feel so victimized when encountering subterranean reasoning? Oh no! The Big Bad Conspiracy Monster is downvoting you! Poor you! If surface reasoning works best for you, and you believe there is nothing of value to be found at the roots below the surface, then carry on as you were. No one is forcing you to subscribe. No one is forcing this reddit upon you. Why do you feel you have to defend yourself and rally with other surface thinkers like it's some sort of war?   It almost seems as if your mind works by majority rule, and you side with whatever side has the predominance of the majority, and your only objective is to ensure that that majority bastion where you reside avoids change.  There used to be a time when the majority held the believe that the Sun circles the Earth. Then there were a handful who used alternative reasoning to say that even though it appears such, in actuality, there is a whole lot more going on than that, as explained by X, Y, Z supporting evidence.  If X, Y, Z doesn't impress upon your belief, than it doesn't. Just say "I don't buy it" and move on.
it figures, shit they couldn't afford and they didn't like it that much anyways. what a waste of garage space and money. anyways, China's government thanks you for wasting your dollars in all that crap.
I drive in the left lane All the time.  Otherwise getting from LA to Bakersfield would just take too long.  10 minutes too long to be exact.
My friend (an atheist) took a road trip there and found that the majority of people were there for the absurdity of it all.  It is a money making amusement park, pure and simple.  The target audience are those that find the absurdity entertaining.
You open the page and right as you are about to start reading this obnoxious box jumps at you like a ninja. Really annoying.
interesting
The part about driving to the dumpster is absolute gold
I miss Mumbai :(
Single A baseball is professional that does not make stats down their have the same value as it does in MLB.  Japan is minor league baseball compared to MLB. 868 is a great feat in Japan but I am much more impressed by someone who can get 500 in MLB. 
Completely agree with the content of this article (not it's title).  There are times when unit testing has huge bang for buck over functional testing.  When the dependencies of a module can be effectively mocked and it's inputs and outputs are are hard to simulate in a functional test, unit testing can be the only way to test some code.  However *in general*, the value of a functional test is orders of magnitude higher than that of a unit test. If an organization is starting from scratch and want to know which to build first, there's never any doubt in my mind - don't even bother building unit tests until you have basic coverage of your main functional use cases as functional tests.
I knew him since elementary school where he was a bully and a dick but by middle/high school we never spoke or interacted anymore. My high school had around 5,000 students.
Not even close.
So I suppose we can expect every long distance running event to have their records broken this year... Cool! 
Japanese people have no souls.
&gt;Fulton, who had been washing dishes when he heard the knock, examined the wallet. !
Man, I love Bob Sapp.  Even when he loses, he's priceless.  
Because there is more competition in growing marijuana, they would have to compete against state subsidies in California, Oregon, Washington etc...
Can you get me free shit of any type?
I don't think they ever claimed they were journalists.  Peace activists come from many walks of life. You never know if they're your plumber or your priest.
Wait, you're recovering for several *days* for your fucking wisdom teeth?  I seriously doubt you'll need that kind of time.  You're body is perfectly capable of being mobile and active without a good jaw / mouth.  I took it easy for about five hours after my operation (mainly to control the bleeding and because I couldn't talk worth a damn because of the Novocain), and then I was back on my feet.  Vicodin also works wonders.  Edit: I suppose I shouldn't be a douchebag, so here's my favorites:  Apocalypse Now  Dark City  Children of Men  A clockwork orange  The departed  The Godfather I and II  Pan's Labyrinth  Pulp Fiction  There Will Be Blood  Star Wars Trilogy  Austin Powers (the first one)  Superbad  Fight Club  Goodfellas  The Matrix movies  The Lord of the Rings trilogy  Memento  Raging Bull  Requiem for a Dream  Reservoir Dogs  The Aviator  Blade Runner  The Bourne movies  City of God  Synecdoche, New York  Kill Bill 1 and 2
Are you drunk?
Is that good? I've seen two posts containing that movie... was that you both times? I may have to see it. 
That's when you slam on your brakes and do some damage ;].
Someone is racing for negative karma. Reminds me of dekotaal.
That's a toupee
They haven't been updated for newer SFML versions, 1.4 and 1.5. The maintainer hasn't posted in the SFML forum in a while either. So don't expect too much support. But I think that SVN is supposed to be up to date with 1.4, just the docs weren't ready or something. Check the D section of the SFML forums. I've been using Derelict lately as well. :)
I like to practice what I call tab discipline. I only allow a maximum of 6 tabs open at once (not counting gmail and similar exceptions) - if I want to open something else, I force myself to read the stuff that's already open, no matter how long it is.   However, I could see how this wouldn't work for programmers or anyone else that may need to constantly refer to 50+ different pages. 
No pun intended? 
Although the actress is hot, her as a vulcan was just *meh*
Welcome to the history of America. Gummint develops stuff, gives it to private companies. PROFIT.
Article 5 of the Honduran Constitution states that 6% of the citizens must sign a petition with their signatures and fingerprints, and the petition must be duly verified by the Electoral Tribunal, and then it must be approved by 2/3 vote in Congress to be put up for referendum.  Needless to say, the Electoral Tribunal never verified such a petition, so the Congress never needed to vote on it, and they would have voted it down anyway.  Besides, you'd need about 450,000 signatures since there's 7,500,000 citizens in Honduras.  But hey, let's just throw out the constitution and do whatever Zelaya wants! Yeahhhhhh!!!
May be...
I think milliknuths would be more appropriate, given some of the geniuses I've seen in the workplace.
I am liking this laptop best of all right now - and I hear that some of the vista problems people had will be somewhat fixed when they come out with the upgraded Vista later this year. 
&gt; Ok, you seem overly aggressive in tone for a response perhaps  Please point out what seems overly aggressive in tone in my above comment.  &gt; I can't think of many people who could claim they were part of a group (one with any real social meaning, e.g. nations, cultures, races, religions) which had NOT participated in "war crimes" at some point. Whether they were/are labeled as such at the time or not  *Nolo contendere.*
You could also try to start a small business or an independent career - maybe this crisis is your chance to do something in life that you really love? Preferably, it should be something that requires no startup money and can be done while searching for employment at the same time, e.g.  * Start a small online business  * Contribute to some OSS and become a consultant for the product * Write a book * Found the I-Walk-Your-Dog Inc. * Start a band, compose a song * Develop some hardcore routing algorithm, patent it and sell it to Cisco
Israel had an excellent reason to stop and search the boat:  Cynthia McKinney.  I wouldn't let that psycho bitch in my country if I could help it.  Especialy after her recent accusations that th eFederal government was rounding up blacks in New Orleans and killing them by the thousands...
But he'll be buried in the legal system for years to come.
and you take it out after you roll?
I think we can safely say his ass is *already* in hot water.
I'll toss my hat in the ring for Dark City. Some of my favorite movies to watch during downtime:  * Back to the Future * Groundhog Day * Gladiator * Equilibrium * Monty Python's anything * Fight Club  I'm sure I am missing a ton, but that should get you started.
PERV!
Hey, the jerk store called earlier. They're running out of you.
You're right.  It's much better at or around medium rare...
You can't convert in-game assets to cash in EVE. There is a system where you pay cash for game time cards and then sell the codes for in-game money. This is supported by the developer. That is the only way that the real economy intersects with the game economy other than under the table dealings that could get you're account banned.  The economy in EVE is very deep, though, and there are a lot of fascinating stories out there.
OK. God is real. But what religion does God expect us to follow? Does it have to be one of the major world religions? Can I make up my own religion? Why not? I know as much about God as anyone else.   The tenets of my religion:  1) God has no interest in religion. 2) Aside from the entertainment value my life may provide, God has no interest in how I live my life.
His personal stance is abortion is unethical from a religions standpoint. His standpoint from a legislative POV is to let the people decide on a state level. If you take the medical MJ debacle, this makes complete sense.   Now I thought I had put this, guess I didnt. This issue is one of a few that I dont agree with Paul. But as a politician, he is one of the few that trys to keep his personal faith out of his legislative decisions. Mabe not to perfection, but a hell of a lot better then the majority of the others. I think he is one of the atheist best choices for a candidate.....since we arnt gonna see any  openly non-believer anytime soon. Honestly if you find a candidate that will hold every single one of your beliefs and legislate that way....then great. But until then I just pick the candidates that hold some. I am not gonna throw the baby out with the bath water because he beleives in hocus pokus, because they all do. 
Don't forget the explosive diarrhea. I never did...
I just thought I'd share [this story](http://encyclopediadramatica.com/Copypasta/Archive_8#YOU_FUCKING_SHITHEAD).  Most likely its just an internet legend, but it's still an impressively crazy room mate story.  Here's a sample:  &gt;His toilet was inoperative at this point, so he used mine for a time, until I refused him access. Later I would find out that he shat in garbage bags and kept them in the common room closet for weeks. More on this later.  &gt;He set fire to our carpet with alcohol during a party. He pissed in the fridge. He shat in the fridge. He shat in the crisper drawer. He shat on the oven top, and instead of cleaning it up, turned on the burner, reasoning that carbon is easier to clean than feces.  &gt;He left a dead cat he found somewhere in our oven for a week and forgot about it. I discovered it later. 
Nope.  &gt;[...the Mendoza Line is said to occur at .200, and when a position player's batting average falls below that level, the player is said to be below the Mendoza Line.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mendoza_Line)
I spent a ***lot*** of time on Wikipedia from the time when it only had a few thousand articles until it became a sort of Stalinist nightmare bureaucracy.  Seriously, don't venture into the inner workings of Wikipedia. You'll want to kill almost everybody you find there.
She would make a killing being a dominatrix! (She is gross, I didn't say a hot dominatrix.)
But then she immediately left again. 
Wait, isn't that a sassy teen girl from High School Musical?
My first Amstel Light was handed to me by Kim Deal - after I had BS'd my way backstage with a fake press pass ( way-back when they opened for U2) She was the nicest most accommodating rock star I ever met - introduced me to Black Francis. The press pass was for an AM station - he had a thing for AM and grilled me in my lie. Didnt matter - he was very cool...Santiago &amp; crew were headed to see Kristin Hersch nearby and invited me along...couldnt - the friends I came with were still waiting for me. Just a very cool night with insanely talented grounded people! 
&gt;do people take this shit seriously?  Sure! My group usually plays a new module by the book (sorry, bad pun) a time or two before settling in to the break-the-DM routine.
That's amore.
Irish independence
Totally believable. At least that he could get marbles in her ass. Dunno about 100, but it is definitly believable that you could get away with it. I've seen some of the shit that people do to people passed out drunk. A lubed marble would go into an ass quite easily... I imagine.
Lol. I feel so stupid. The first time i didn't even understand where the humor was, then i watched them come by again, and felt like a dumbass.
I've been in my fair share of private trackers, and they are just too much of a hassle. It's hard to maintain a good ratio when most ISPs offer such shitty upload speeds. You constantly have to plan just to make sure your ratio is 1.0. Some trackers don't give you access to new files until 24-48hrs if your ratio is &lt;1.0. By the time you get access to the file, it is already full of seeders. Some users even rent seedboxes just to increase their ratio. All this just makes it harder to maintain a good ratio, especially if you plan to be using your internet for something other than torrenting all day. Gaming suffers really bad even if you throttle your upload and use QoS.  Anyways, public trackers + $25 astraweb account is what I use. TPB had a massive library, and it sucks to lose it.
Yeah, there's no way they can't resist £16m for Valencia or £12m for Palacios, when you consider how much they originally paid for them. It's deals like those, the Redknapp-style wheeling &amp; dealing, that will enable Wigan to push up the table a bit, or at the very least consolidate their midtable position. Martinez certainly has a challenge, spending the money wisely and filling Steve Bruce's shoes.
If you are/look Japanese, they might let you in, if you nihongo is good.  Otherwise they don't let the gaijin in; they think gaijin have AIDS and other diseases, which is debatable at best.  I don't know Beppu, but as for dating Japanese girls, small towns have a major disadvantage and a major advantage.  The disadvantage:  fewer women, fewer bars and clubs.  Advantage:  as a gaijin you are (to *some* Japanese women) an exotic treat!  Find those women instead.  It may take some work, but it's better than wasting your time at a fucking soapland.
It's offensive, the advocating of the death of the natural world. I take it personally. 
BritishEnglishPolice has made me feel like a man again.  I will love him forever
Support for the use of nuclear energy [gallup poll](http://www.gallup.com/poll/117025/support-nuclear-energy-inches-new-high.aspx): __Republican @ 71% vs Democrat @ 52%__  This doesn't strike me as a right wing issue in the US if half of the left also supports nuclear power. The difference based on gender is far more pronounced, with many more men than women supporting it.  There was a comprehensive study done in Canada which had even closer numbers from the right and left wings, and it further showed that (in Canada) the more educated a person, the more likely they were to support nuclear power. [study](http://74.125.47.132/search?q=cache:O6xLGLi9IFUJ:www.cna.ca/english/pdf/publicpolling/Omnibus-July03SummaryReport.pdf+support+for+nuclear+among+university+educated+surveys&amp;cd=20&amp;hl=en&amp;ct=clnk&amp;gl=ca#4).  If it is valid to characterize it as right vs left, you could just as easily characterize it as educated vs less-educated based on the same reasoning, and I don't really think that is valid.
He's a partisan hack job. I've heard him comment on politics. But hey, now he'll get to prove me right.
It's worse than that; He's dead Jim.
My friend told me that in Malaysia, Night Rider also call as Mat Rempit. Wondering if any type name for the Night Rider in other country.
Guys *do* use it to get girls to give in, but it's not a myth.  It's painful enough to take up a big chunk of one's attention.
Reckless, yet delicious. 
Yes! Because it will, um, hurt the economy and stuff! Because people will need to spend money on the tax, instead of, um, other, super-important stuff, that they should really be able to spend their money on instead of the carbon tax. Because, yeah, global warming? That's just a hoax. It was made up by the government. No, don't ask why. I said it was made up by the government, it's clearly true. Fine, I'll give you a reason. It's because we're sheeple, and they want to stay in power, and creating this hoax helps their power. And so we should fight this carbon tax! Because it's pro-environment! And since global warming isn't real, we can just say **Fuck the environment!**
I didn't even know there was a need for it  I'm so used to pressing CTRL+T
I see what you did there. ;)
WITH NEW FLAVORS LIKE MANANA, FIZZBITCH, AND **GUN**
People have a tendency that once gun laws get way too strict they kind of go, fuck it.  Even my *friend's* dad, whose one of those really good perfect law abiding citizens that doesn't even have a speeding ticket on his record, lives in CA and kind of said fuck it.  I pointed out to him that his home defense shotgun with an extended magazine, tactical pistol grip, and short barrel as well as a few other modifications was considered an assault weapon.  His response, "So, how do they expect to take it?".
The comic, at least, has no concept of the trinity. Furthermore, in some *Christian* belief systems, the trinity is denied, as a polytheism, just as the comic states. It might be said to be making fun of the Catholic trinity, but their conception of the trinity, perhaps bafflingly, explains away the problems of the three-in-one "polytheism" that could be called "pagan" (all of which was resolved about 1700 years ago at the First Council of Nicea when Arian was declared a heretic. I'm a thoroughgoing atheist with a soft spot for byzantium, and I think that above all it is idiotic to make fun of Christianity in general by calling it "pagan", *of course* its "pagan" (which simply means non-Christian), what other material would they have had to work with? The crucial point is the divinity of christ, which once accepted brings in necessary problems with Christ's identity or non-identity with God, making the trinity a legitimate issue to be tussled with within the theological context. Ok. Too stoned to ramble anymore.
i wish someone other than lewrockwell.com would run with this.  i heard this on the radio and it was pretty shitty
I was hoping for magnificent mosquitoes :(
Yet to be convicted, not very reassuring.  I'm waiting for that to occur.  After all, as of late June, they had 69% of the market share*, a pretty heavy market share, arguably monopolistic.  Given that they market it as, in essence, as a phone with a portable computing device (in actuality, it's the other way around), I wouldn't be surprised if someone tried to take them to court over some of their practices, especially regarding jailbreaking and the app store.  While I think MS has done some horrible practices, Apple bricking your phone when you try to jailbreak and creating a closed marketplace is worse by far to me.  *http://apple20.blogs.fortune.cnn.com/2009/06/25/iphone-share-of-u-s-smartphone-traffic-hits-69/
司法書士の通信講座の選び方をお話しします 
This was a lot of fun. Funny how it's a satire against Upgrade system games, because I had a lot of fun upgrading stuff. Bigger, faster, stronger!
That's a s'moré.
Are you kidding me? A fat person, maybe one who is fat buy lost a lot of weight recently and has really flabby skin, could get 100% seal around the seat.  If it is suction that could totally pull someone's asshole outside of their body.
Perhaps then it is the football player that was drafted in 1969 who, in his hayday, was nicknamed the Juice?
In some parts of Texas 90 is the speed where that happens.
Why couldn't the mirror be placed with an unmanned probe?  Actually, aren't we bouncing signals off Mars? I'm pretty sure we haven't put anyone there, yet...
Breaking news? Where the hell have you been?
For the bailey's just use it instead of milk for a lot of things - french toast w/ bailey's is really good.  Also for baking.  The beer use it when cooking sausage - brown the sausage first then add beer and sauerkraut. The rum or brandy can be used for banana's foster.  Vodka can be used for pasta sauce, same with red wine.  
It's about Franken time.
Fuck.  I'm on the opposite end of that.  Living with a male friend and several of his buddies next year... hope that goes ok.
*Honestly? Really?* Do I *really* have to find the damn wikipedia pages for you?  *Fine...*  * [ENGLAND](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monarchy_of_the_United_Kingdom "Why am I doing this?")  * [CANADA](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monarchy_of_Canada "You really suck for making me do this, y'know")  * [AUSTRALIA](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monarchy_of_Australia "I hope you die in a fire.")  * [NEW ZEALAND](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monarchy_of_New_Zealand "Really I do")  * [JAMAICA](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monarchy_of_Jamaica "Jamaican me crazy you bitch.")  * [BARBADOS](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monarchy_of_Barbados "I don't think I can come up with 16 lines of clever alt-text. Whore.")  * [BAHAMAS](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monarchy_of_the_Bahamas "...")  * [GRENADA](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monarchy_of_Grenada "That sounds like grenades.")  * [PAPUA NEW GUINEA](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monarchy_of_Papua_New_Guinea "K I honestly don't know where that is.")  * [SOLOMON ISLANDS](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monarchy_of_the_Solomon_Islands "Please tell me I can stop this...")  * [TUVALU](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monarchy_of_Tuvalu "AAAAAA")  *  [SAINT LUCIA](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monarchy_of_Saint_Lucia "No idea.")  * [NAME IS TOO LONG](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monarchy_of_Saint_Vincent_and_the_Grenadines "It really is too long.")  * [BELIZE](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monarchy_of_Belize "That's what she said btw, too long. not.")  * [ANTIGUA](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monarchy_of_Antigua_and_Barbuda "Yay I'm done! You suck.")  In *all* of these countries she retains her Monarch powers, and if she truly felt it necessary could supercede decisions by elected officials. The only reason she doesn't is to avoid causing a civil war and losing her powers. She doesn't use her powers willy-nilly as to do so would be to lose them. *All* of those countries also swear loyalty to *her*.  That's still pretty damn powerful.
"Harder to get rid of like AIDS"? By that you mean incurable? Though I did laugh at the "sabre-toothed crotch crickets". 
In college, I lived with a few roommates and a random girl we added to round out the lease.  At first she seemed cool, a little OK, but a few weeks in and I'd come home every Friday and she'd be doing the phone rounds: "OK, so first, we'll pregame at Delta, then hit the party at Sig Chi, and then there's supposed to be an afterparty at Gamma Tau" or something like that.  She was such a slut.  I'd always have to deal with her douchebag frat boy acquaintances coming over for a fuck.  At some point during the semester, she thought she was pregnant and so she would announce that she was doing her crunches for the evening in an effort to abort the baby.  But the worst was when there was a scandal that actually made the national news about a bunch of fraternity hazings, and she of course was dating the guy who was in charge of it all.  He was banned from entering dorms and so he was over all the time because none of his other date rapes lived off-campus.  At least she didn't mess with my stuff.  I believe her hometown was the "trucker capital of America".
that's a whore, eh?
OK, here's how it boils down. You say you love her, she will either a) happily agree or b) stare awkwardly then ask to leave.  What kind of person do you think you are dealing with? This post started out as a warning that if you tell her what you want to say, she might never talk to you again. But you appear to have reasons to be confident that that would not happen ..
"Unblinking" = full of hearsay and anonymous sources.  Got it.
I would have to have seen that presentation in person, otherwise it seems rather gimmicky and tacky. I mean it's one thing to learn about history by immersing oneself into the scenario, it's another to be sitting there playing pictionary then have someone sneak up and break a piece of glass over your head screaming "IT WAS AUSCHWITZ!"
Yea I looked at some of the netbooks but I don't think its what I need. I also have a blackberry bold which makes having an ultra portable netbook useless for me. 
Comment from the article:  " 86. This tugs are most likely Russians, not Jews about 40% of immigrants from former Soviet Union are not genetically Jews. Jews as a general rule are not capable to do such a brutal physical beating. Russians, Ukrainians from another hand, again, in general, are brutal people."
Too funny.  And the yellow dog always knows it sinned.
It's one paragraph. I don't know how anyone could make any sort of valuable judgment, and I don't know how you expect them to?
OK, but is remembering a company the most important thing? Sure, I remember them. I remember I hate them for it. And I do understand what you're saying, it's just that I don't remember them without associating strong dislike for those ads.
I haven't even read/heard a single word from FOX News on this issue, as I don't watch/read FOX News. Are you done grasping for straws?  BBC says the Congress voted to remove him. Are they also lying?
Not a shot at Korean people.  Just an observation about an apparent cultural trait I've noticed among several Korean people I've known.  If anything, the implication is that Korean people are too humble.
This needs to happen if only to see some of the more incompetent coaches try to out-dumb each other. Too bad Romeo Crennel is not in charge of a team anymore.
[Outcast](http://www.outcast-thegame.com/gallery/audio.htm) - Russian Symphony Orchestra. [Track 4 is great](ftp://ftp.infogrames.net/mp3/outcast-thegame/octrack4.mp3)
My guess is they consider Gaza/Palestine a sovereign nation, and don't recognize Israel's claim to those waters.  "President Obama just told Israel to let in humanitarian and reconstruction supplies, and that's exactly what we tried to do." McKinney said  If Obama was the President of Israel, she would have a valid point.
Are you?
Cute baby! Magnificent ear-action!
Try harder in school. Don't date that one girl.
Possibly the same phisher (at least one that was spamming the Reddit group a few weeks ago) forgot to change the login form to send data to his own php script - it still fired it off to the genuine steam community website.  I think most of these scammers are n00bs / Nigerians looking for a quick buck.
Still, I have seen way crazier shit. She should count herself lucky than they're not disowning her.  I admit that her parents are not cool, but seriously, she's going to be fine (although poor) if she just stops wasting her time (which she obviously did if she failed all her classes).
Ok, something like that already happened but at the end it didn't seem right (for some quite objective reasons) to tell her. But we had a good time. Is it too bad to do that a week or so later? 
Sounds like she gave it to 19 people yes she should inform them that she has an std .Sorry but she's going to become a loner to her friends.
Thats a Blue-ray.
Hmmm ... I had no idea. I only use utorrent every once in a while if there is something that I really need. I guess I don't need much.
But Sen. Ron Gould, R-Lake Havasu City, said suspending the state's operations could be necessary to bring Arizona's expenses in line with revenue.  "We need to right-size Arizona's government, and we need to do it quickly," Gould said. "If we have to shut down government to do that, so be it."  It's good to know that rational thought is prevailing to deal with this.
&gt;Most of the hot girls I know have promoters  what?
You mean something along the lines of a hypothetical designersneedscoders.com? I'd actually be willing to host something like that, it wouldn't be the first project spawned from Redditors that improves the Internet. Let's suppose though, what would it be? A forum? A custom web app?   The clear purpose would be to reverse the current FOSS trend and engage designers rather than programmers in the actual design process of a given application. Can we overcome the programmers' pride psychology somehow?   I'd like some kind of site that spawns viable projects with a clear sight of visual and usability design rather than technical design (which a programmer will take care of anyhow).
When the tv guide stopped working on our DVR (epg company it was hard coded to use went out of business), I wrote some code that downloaded one off the net and shoved into to database the DVR was looking at, restoring it to it's former glory. That finally got my coding skills some appreciation!
So why do you work there?
Pathological liars can be completely wonderful people besides their disorder. Maybe that's why it pisses me off so much. They don't have an excuse. FUCK, I hate liars!
[nod] I wonder how much of the conspiracy started *after* Capricorn One was released...
The Bible clearly indicates that the Earth is flat and that the sky is a giant bowl overhead:  http://www.lhup.edu/~dsimanek/febible.htm  &gt; ...the Hebrews considered the vault of heaven a solid, physical object. Such a large dome would be a tremendous feat of engineering. The Hebrews (and supposedly Yahweh Himself) considered it exactly that, and this point is hammered home by five scriptures:   Job 9:8, “...who by himself spread out the heavens [shamayim]...”   Psalm 19:1, “The heavens [shamayim] tell out the glory of God, the vault of heaven [raqiya] reveals his handiwork.”   Psalm 102:25, “...the heavens [shamayim] were thy handiwork.”   Isaiah 45:12, “I, with my own hands, stretched out the heavens [shamayim] and caused all their host to shine...”   Isaiah 48:13, “...with my right hand I formed the expanse of the sky [shamayim]...”  &gt;... the essential flatness of the earth's surface is required by verses like Daniel 4:10-11. In Daniel, the king “saw a tree of great height at the centre of the earth...reaching with its top to the sky and visible to the earth's farthest bounds.” If the earth were flat, a sufficiently tall tree would be visible to “the earth's farthest bounds,” but this is impossible on a spherical earth.   Note, I should point out many good Christian scientists view the creation myth as metaphor.   But creationists take it LITERALLY. And if you're going to do that then take the whole thing literally, giant trees, flat earth and all. 
Single people can't adopt where you are?  
World-record setting motorcycle adventurers, Simon and Lisa Thomas visit Touratech to make some upgrades to their bikes before leaving for the next four years of their journey.
See, *this* is why only the craziest managers decide to play chicken with the union reps when contracts are up for renewal.
A couple of small edits have stuck.  Mostly I removed advertisements from video game articles and random grammar fixes on anything I come across.  There was one politician whose page I edited that I had to fight to keep fixed.  I forget who it was, but basically he was in the news for something and during that something he told somebody to "go fuck himself."  Well, on Wikipedia the story was told that he "told a reporter to do something anatomically impossible to himself." That was the most bizarre sentence I had read, but apparently there was somebody who really really did not want "fuck" to show up in Wikipedia, claiming that the article I cited was not good enough because it wrote "go fuck yourself" as "go f*** yourself" and well, that could be pretty much anything.  Luckily another Wikipedian found a sound clip from another article about the story and put the issue to rest.  It felt good to put a substantial edit in.  Too bad I don't remember the guy's name, I'd link it.
This..
A little distracted to really comment here...........so um.......yea...........
I suspect it is to funnel you towards more adviews/adclicks rather than actual page hits, but who knows. And sorry, don't know an official term for it. But would like to know the term so I may add it my list of things I despise.
WOW!
No, the journalists they were quoting, are. Which AP notes, for obvious reasons.
That kid looks so messed up now, hope his face grows back. Never underestimate a retired boxer. EVER! 
That's O.J.
Or you hang out with the kid with Nintendo Power magazine. 
anyone have see crooked houses like this
WOW. This is freaking great! I didn't even realize it was a bookmarklet till you pointed it out.
Nowhere in the article does it give an example of how the residents of Modoc county are getting more welfare. It merely says they're getting "welfare of some kind".   Well break it down, let's see exactly what state services they're getting, instead of the poster saying it's welfare, and the author of the article saying they're getting "welfare checks of some kind to get by".
I just bought one: image-bank.net for my imagebank (not connected yet)  I couldn't believe even that one was free, so I got really happy to get it.  Most domain namnes are taken by some bullshit linkfarms, and I hate it.
That's an O.J.
that one gets points taken off for having a deleted comment so high up
Un chien andalou, Le charme discret de  la bourgeoisie and Entr' acte.   Thats enough to get you started on the whole surrealist movement. 
Some days its best to just keep your mouth shut.
The OS is not what is important with HDDErase. The chipset is. It is a selfbooting floppy disk.
I've a had a roommate shake the bunk beds so much it woke me up. 
True dat.
